Keywords: safety training, occupational hazards, meta-analysis In what has been described as the nation’s worst mining disaster in 40 years (Cooper, 2010), 29 miners died and two more were seriously injured in an explosion at the Upper Big Branch mine in West Virginia on April 5, 2010 (Mining Safety and Health Administration [MSHA], n.d.-b). 
In the years leading up to this disaster, the Upper Big Branch mine was cited for a very large number of MSHA violations (MSHA, n.d.-c). 
The pattern of violations indicates several things. 
First, the Upper Big Branch mine had significant and systematic safety-related problems prior to the explosion on April 5, suggesting that the explosion was more than a chance occurrence. 
Second, many of the problems were training related or training relevant. 
Of the violations specific to training regulations, half were deemed to be significant and substantial, meaning that there was a reasonable likelihood of these violations resulting in serious injury or illness. 
Many more of the mine’s violations, a large number of which deemed to be significant and substantial, were relevant to the content of the training required for miners. 
For instance, the mine was repeatedly in violation of 30 C.F.R. § 75.370 (mine ventilation plan; Mandatory Safety Standards Underground Coal Mines, 2008), 30 C.F.R. § 75.400 (accumulation of combustible materials; Mandatory Safety Standards Underground Coal Mines, 2008), 30 C.F.R. § 75.220 (roof control plan; Mandatory Safety Standards Underground Coal Mines, 2008), and 30 C.F.R. § 75.202 (protection from falls of roof, face, and ribs; Mandatory Safety Standards Underground Coal Mines, 2008), issues which were supposed to be part of the miners’ safety training, as per federal regulations (MSHA, n.d.-d). 
In the training plan submitted by Performance Coal Company, the operator of the Upper Big Branch mine, and approved by MSHA on March 29, 2007 (MSHA, n.d.-a), the methods employed in the training courses for new and experienced miners are described. 
For instance, self-rescuer and respiratory device training for new miners is conducted via lecture, demonstrations, and hands-on training: Training will include instruction and demonstration in the use, care and maintenance of the rescue and respiratory devices used at the mine. 
Hands on training in the complete donning of all rescue devices used at the mine, which includes assuming the donning position, opening the device, activating the device, inserting the mouth, putting the nose clip on and transferring between all rescue devices used at the mine. 
(MSHA, n.d.-a, p. 4) In contrast, the objectives covered in new miner training on roof control and ventilation plans are conducted via lecture and visual aids. 
The recent work of Burke et al. (2006) indicates that safety Michael J. Burke, Freeman School of Business and Department of Environmental Health Sciences, School of Public Health and Tropical Medicine, Tulane University; Rommel O. Salvador, Milgard School of Business, University of Washington Tacoma; Kristin Smith-Crowe, David Eccles School of Business, University of Utah; Suzanne Chan-Serafin, Australian School of Business, University of New South Wales, Sydney, Australia; Alexis Smith and Shirley Sonesh, Freeman School of Business, Tulane University. 
Alexis Smith is now at the Anisfield School of Business, Ramapo College of New Jersey. 
Correspondence concerning this article should be addressed to Michael J. Burke, Freeman School of Business, Tulane University, 7 McAlister Drive, New Orleans, LA 70118. 
E-mail: mburke1@tulane.edu training methodology has important implications for the effectiveness of training in terms of trainee knowledge and performance. 
Considering methodology alone, their findings suggest that the more engaging methods used in the self-rescuer and respiratory device training will have a greater effect on miner safety knowledge and performance than will the less engaging methods used in roof control and ventilation plans training. 
Indeed, most repeated violations were in roof control and ventilation plans, the areas in which miners were trained via less engaging methods. 
Yet other factors may play a significant role in training effectiveness; notably, the particular hazard or hazardous conditions necessitating safety training are likely important. 
Currently, however, a gap exists in both the scientific and practice literatures as to where and how to systematically incorporate information on the severity or seriousness of injury, illness, and fatality potential (i.e., event/exposure information) into worker safety training efforts. 
In terms of the example above, we do not know whether information regarding exposure to harmful substances relevant to the use of self-rescuer and respiratory devices suggests the need for a training methodology (i.e., level of training engagement) different from that for roof control and ventilation (i.e., where the event/exposure may relate to rock falls or explosions). 
This shortcoming is notable given that the nature of a hazard itself dictates what constitutes safe work behavior, including when individuals should take precautions against a threat (Weinstein, 2000). 
Moreover, all theories of health-protective behavior consider the nature of the hazard as important in the creation of motivation for self-protection (see Brewer et al., 2007; Kirscht, 1988; Prentice-Dunn & Rogers, 1986; Rogers, 1983; Ronis, 1992). 
The study reported here is an investigation of two variables— hazardous events/exposures and safety training method—expected to interact so as to affect knowledge acquisition and workplace safety behavior. 
The aim of the study was to systematically examine expectations concerning how different types of objectively determined hazardous events/exposures lead to enhanced learning and behavioral outcomes when considered in the context of safety training programs that vary in terms of social and experiential activities (i.e., training method). 
Drawing on dialogical theories of experiential learning and behavior and the literature on risk perception, a central premise of this study was that the perception of risk associated with different types of events/exposures is socially and experientially engendered and that it creates motivation to learn and transfer acquired knowledge to the job. 
While the positive effects of more socially engaging workforce training and development interventions have been documented (see Burke et al., 2006; Taylor, Russ-Eft, & Chan, 2005), the relationships among safety training activities, objective event/exposure considerations, and learning and performance outcomes have been largely unarticulated and unexplored. 
Obtaining greater understanding of such associations is necessary for optimally designing safety interventions to ultimately achieve desired outcomes, including reduction in severe workplace injuries, illnesses, and fatalities. 
In this sense, our research is consistent with recent calls to provide insights into organizational behavior more generally by examining how social processes contribute to understanding organizational safety (e.g., see Barton & Sutcliffe, 2009; Turner & Gray, 2009). 
To unfold our study, we initially discuss aspects of risk. 
This discussion provides definitions of key terms and indicates how perceptions of risk are socially constructed. 
Subsequently, we discuss social and experiential theories of learning and present hypotheses concerning the relative effectiveness of different methods of safety training. 
Thereafter, we discuss how and why social and experiential forms of training would be expected to enhance the motivation to learn and the motivation to transfer training to the job, especially in relation to the motivation to learn about and avoid hazardous events and exposures of an ominous nature. 
Here, we present hypotheses concerning interactive effects of safety training engagement and objective hazardous events/exposures in the explanation of safety training effectiveness for learning and behavior. 
Aspects of Risk and Evidence of the Social Construction of Risk Perceptions Over the past several decades, the literature on risk and risk perception has burgeoned, with studies drawing on a variety of disciplinary perspectives including political science, psychology, sociology, and safety engineering (e.g., Roberts, 1997; Slovic, 1997; Weinstein, 2000). 
In general, these literatures consider objective risk or danger as the likelihood of harm (i.e., injury or illness), with terms such as probability, susceptibility, and vulnerability used interchangeably. 
In the psychological literature, the concern is often the likelihood of harm when no action or an inappropriate action is taken (e.g., Weinstein, 2000). 
This aspect of risk is typically considered to be distinct from the magnitude of the negative outcome, or seriousness of harm if no action or an inappropriate action is taken (see Slovic, 1987, 1997). 
Perceptions of risk almost always include some assessment of the likelihood and seriousness of harm or injury potential. Given that workers have difficulty judging and interpreting probabilities (Brewer et al., 2007), the literature has generally found that perceptions of risk are more informative than objective indicators of risk in the prediction of behavioral outcomes (e.g., Morrow & Crum, 1998). 
Furthermore, a number of subgroup differences in risk perceptions have been documented, including differences between males and females (e.g., Barke, Jenkins-Smith, & Slovic, 1997; Greenberg & Schneider, 1995), between supervisors and line workers (e.g., Weyman & Clarke, 2003), and among national/cultural groups of workers in the same occupation (e.g., Perez-Floriano, 2001). 
The fact that numerous subgroup differences in risk perceptions exist (including documented differences within the same culture, work setting, and occupation) demonstrates that the social construction of risk beliefs are context bound. 
In fact, Pidgeon (1991) and others (e.g., Fleming, Flin, Mearns, & Gordon, 1998; PerezFloriano & Gonzalez, 2007; Rundmo, 1996) have discussed notions of safety subcultures and how these subcultures influence the perception of risk and, ultimately, work behavior. 
More recently, investigators have begun to explore social and experiential influences to better understand why different social groups (within the same organization) appear to have different interpretations of risk (e.g., Weyman & Clarke, 2003). 
While several studies have enhanced the understanding of how workers’ experiences relate to risk perceptions, these investigations have generally neglected the literature on dialogical theories of learning and behavior (e.g., see Burke, Scheurer, & Meredith, 2007; Holman, 2000; Holman, Pavlica, & Thorpe, 1997). 
It is our belief that these latter learning perspectives offer considerable theoretical insight for understand47 ing the social construction of not only learning but also risk perceptions and the motivation to learn. 
In the following section, we discuss how learning is expected to occur within social contexts. 
We then discuss how different training methods (i.e., forms of learning) would be expected to interact with hazardous events/ exposures in the development of perceptions of risks and the motivation to learn. 
Expectations From Dialogical Theories of Experiential Learning and Behavior Closely aligned with action theories and social learning theory are the dialogical approaches to experiential learning. 
The dialogical approaches highlight the social and contextual nature of learning and view thought, in large part, as a structured product (in the sense of schemas and accounts) of the internalization of interpersonal action where language use plays an important role in this process (Cunliffe, 2002; Holman, 2000). 
Although dialogical theorists recognize the role of individual differences and external stimuli in shaping learning, their focus is on how learning about objects and entities is achieved through a temporal flow of contingent communication (Lave & Wenger, 1991; Schon, 1983; Weil & McGill, 1989), how individuals develop and sustain ways of verbally relating themselves to others, and how these communicative interactions enable them to make sense of their surroundings (Shotter, 1995; Wildemeersch, 1989). 
This point is particularly relevant to occupational safety where occupations or industry groups often develop their own jargon and symbols that convey what is important to members (Hansen, 1995). 
For instance, hazardous waste operations and emergency response trainees and trainers have a rather elaborate manner of communicating hazard information between each other (see Labor Institute, n.d.; Midwest Consortium for Hazardous Waste Worker Training, 1992) that involves numbers (e.g., 1 ϭ explosives, 2 ϭ gases), colors (e.g., yellow ϭ reactivity hazard, white ϭ special hazard), symbols (e.g., circle with flame ϭ oxidizing hazard, propeller ϭ radioactive hazard), and acronyms (e.g., IDLH ϭ immediately dangerous to life and health, PEL ϭ permissible exposure limit). 
These numbers, colors, symbols, and acronyms form an efficient means for both verbal and nonverbal communications among hazardous waste workers and emergency responders where the information communicated is frequently of high importance in relation to personal and public well-being. 
The implication of a dialogical approach for the acquisition of safety-related work skills is that learning methods that are more engaging (in the sense of incorporating elements of action, dialogue, and reflection) will enhance knowledge acquisition relative to less engaging (passive, more programmed) means of knowledge development. 
In addition, more engaging methods of learning would also be expected to force trainees to infer causal and conditional relations between events and actions; in this way, such methods can alter trainees’ ways of thinking and acting, particularly in novel situations. 
Active approaches to learning, where trainees are encouraged to learn from errors made, have been shown to be positively related to the learning and adaptive transfer of knowledge (e.g., see Bell & Kozlowski, 2008; Hacker, 2003; Keith & Frese, 2008). 
In effect, more engaging forms of learning are expected to not only improve knowledge acquisition in training contexts but also promote the transfer of knowledge to the job, especially in regard to the development of anticipatory thinking for avoiding accidents in both routine and nonroutine types of work. 
Burke et al. (2006) reported a meta-analysis that examined the relative effectiveness of safety and health training methods according to the extent to which trainees participated in the learning process. 
Their meta-analytic findings were consistent with the theoretical argument that as the method of safety and health training becomes more engaging (going from passive, less engaging methods, such as lecture, to experiential-based, highly engaging methods, such as hands-on training that incorporates dialogue), the training becomes more effective, resulting in greater knowledge acquisition, a higher level of safety performance, and a greater reduction in accidents and injuries. 
Recently, the conclusions reached in Burke et al. (2006) were brought into question by Robson et al. (2010), a team of researchers associated with Canada’s Institute for Work & Health and the United States’s National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health. 
On the basis of a highly selective qualitative review of 16 experimental studies, Robson et al. concluded that their review team found insufficient evidence of high engagement training having a greater impact on occupational health and safety-related behaviors compared to low/medium engagement training. 
The Robson et al. white paper is highly significant in terms of workplace safety and public health as it conveys, from a governmental perspective, what is believed to be the best scientific evidence on worker safety training effectiveness relative to training engagement. 
Given the above theoretical arguments and empirical findings in the literature concerning the effect of highly engaging forms of training on learning and performance, the publication of 38 additional training studies since 2003, when Burke et al.’s (2006) data-collection efforts concluded, and the recent government study and policy statement by Robson et al. (2010) that questions the relative effectiveness of highly engaging safety training in comparison to low/moderate engagement safety training, we constructively replicated the investigation of Burke et al. in regard to the training outcomes that are most relevant to this investigation (i.e., changes in knowledge and safety performance associated with training). 
More specifically, we tested the following hypotheses: Hypothesis 1: In comparison to less engaging safety training, highly engaging safety training will be associated with greater knowledge acquisition. 
Hypothesis 2: In comparison to less engaging safety training, highly engaging safety training will be associated with higher safety performance. 
The Social Construction of Dread Arguments within dialogical theories of experiential learning also provide a theoretical basis for understanding how safetyrelevant motivations (i.e., the motivation to learn and the motivation to transfer acquired knowledge) emerge within safety training contexts. 
A key argument within dialogical theories of learning is that through communication processes and social interaction, one understands properties of objects and entities, including the risks associated with different types of hazardous events and exposures. 
Furthermore, communication and social interaction in highly en48 gaging forms of safety training (e.g., hands-on and experiential based) typically provide rich, detailed information about hazardous events and exposures and frequently demonstrate the health consequences of exposures. 
In contrast, less engaging forms of training, such as lecture and programmed learning, present limited opportunities for social interaction or action, dialogue, and reflection in relation to hazard exposures. 
When hazardous events and exposures are of an ominous nature (e.g., fires and explosions; exposure to toxic chemicals, radiation, or HIV; see Mullet, Cuitad, & Riviere-Shafighi, 2004), the action, dialogue, and considerable reflection that take place in the highly engaging forms of training would be expected to engender dread, a realization of the dangers in the work context and associated negative affect. 
This realization of injury/illness vulnerability and the experienced feelings or affect should play a primary role in motivating individuals to learn about how to avoid exposure to such hazards. 
The arguments that cognitions and affect play direct and primary roles in motivating learning and behavior are not new (e.g., see Tennyson & Jorczak, 2008, for a discussion of the interactive cognitive complexity learning model). 
In particular, scholars across disciplines have theorized and found empirical support for the idea that unpleasant feelings can motivate people to act in ways that they think will minimize such feelings or avoid the negative consequences associated with inaction (e.g., see Baumeister, Vohs, DeWall, & Zhang, 2007; Beer, Heerey, Keltner, Scabini, & Knight, 2003; Schwartz & Clore, 1988; Slovic & Peters, 2006; Sweeny & Shepperd, 2007; Warren & Smith-Crowe, 2008). 
However, while we would expect the unpleasant feelings and thoughts in relation to ominous hazards to be especially at the forefront of workers’ subjective experiences in highly engaging training, we do not expect such thoughts and reactions to necessarily divert attentional resources away from knowledge acquisition. 
The active approach to learning within highly engaging forms of training should assist with the regulation of negative emotions by focusing attention on the means to cope with or avoid the danger. 
Unlike heightened levels of anxiety that have been shown to negatively relate to the motivation to learn in general training contexts (see Colquitt, LePine, & Noe, 2000), the dread factor would be expected to enhance the motivation to learn within highly engaging forms of safety training and with respect to hazards of an ominous nature. 
Thus, we would expect an increase in training engagement to have a substantial effect on training outcomes when hazardous event/exposure does have severe injury or illness potential. In contrast, when hazardous events and exposures do not have severe injury potential (e.g., contact with objects and equipment, excessive physical effort, or repetitive bodily motion), we would not expect the dread factor to be produced in highly engaging forms of training. 
Elevated levels of affect would not necessarily be expected to occur in relation to actively learning about these types of hazards. 
Similarly, while less engaging forms of safety training would be expected to inform trainees of the nature of particular hazards, these types of training would also not be expected to engender affective reactions in relation to possible exposure to hazards of any nature. 
That is, the usual limited opportunities for social interaction within less engaging training would be expected to lessen the social construction of motivation to learn about the hazardous events and exposures irrespective of the potential severity of the event/exposure and, consequently, lessen the motivation to transfer this knowledge to the work setting. 
Thus, we would expect only modestly improved training outcomes in highly engaging as compared to less engaging safety training when hazardous event/exposure does not have severe injury or illness potential. Together, the above conceptual arguments undergird the following hypotheses: Hypothesis 3: Hazardous event/exposure severity moderates the relationship between training engagement and knowledge acquisition, such that the relationship is stronger for events/ exposures that are more likely to produce or inflict severe injury, illness, or death in comparison to events/exposures that are less likely to produce or inflict severe injury, illness, or death. 
Hypothesis 4: Hazardous event/exposure severity moderates the relationship between training engagement and safety performance, such that the relationship is stronger for events/ exposures that are more likely to produce or inflict severe injury, illness, or death in comparison to events/exposures that are less likely to produce or inflict severe injury, illness, or death. 
Method Search and Inclusion Criteria Initially, potentially relevant articles published between 1971 (immediately following the passage of the 1970 U.S. 
Occupational Safety and Health Act) and December 2008 were identified via searches of electronic databases (including PubMed, PsycINFO, and Google Scholar) using the following key words: health and safety training, health training intervention, safety training intervention, safety training, health training, error management and intervention, error prevention and intervention, safety intervention, health intervention, occupational health and safety, needlestick, NIOSH and intervention, and OSHA and intervention. 
We also manually searched each of the following journals: Accident Analysis & Prevention, American Journal of Industrial Medicine, American Journal of Infection Control, American Journal of Public Health, Ergonomics, Journal of Applied Psychology, Journal of Occupational and Environmental Hygiene, Journal of Occupational and Environmental Medicine, Journal of Safety Research, Infection Control in Hospital Epidemiology, Personnel Psychology, Safety Science, Scandinavian Journal of Work, and Environment and Health. 
Furthermore, the reference lists of each qualitative and quantitative review found were searched to identify any relevant articles cited in these documents. 
Through this process, we identified over 800 potentially relevant articles reporting safety training research in primarily the health care, agriculture, manufacturing, and construction industries. 
Studies were included in the analysis if they met certain criteria. 
First, studies had to be quasi-experimental or experimental studies, meaning that they had to involve an experimental intervention and observation of its effects. 
Second, participants in the studies could be of any age but had to be from a working population (the sample included mostly adults and some youth workers). 
Third, the following elements needed to be clearly identified: the method of training (i.e., high, moderate, or low levels of engagement), the 49 nature of the workplace hazard (e.g., falls, contact with objects, or exposure to dangerous substances), and the dependent variables (safety knowledge and safety performance). 
Fourth, studies had to be conducted at the individual level of analysis such that the intervention focused on improving individual workers’ safety knowledge and performance. 
Coding of Studies Having identified the studies to be included, we coded the studies to address our main research questions. 
Our primary interests in this investigation were (a) to examine the previously noted effect of training method (i.e., level of engagement) on workers’ safety-related knowledge and performance (see Burke et al., 2006) and (b) to determine whether the severity of the hazardous event/ exposure in workers’ environments moderates the relationships between level of training engagement and learning and performance outcomes. 
Each study was coded for training method, safety-related knowledge, and performance by two independent coders; discrepancies were resolved by a third consensus coder. 
Each study was coded for hazardous event/exposure by two different independent coders; discrepancies were resolved by the same third consensus coder. 
In this way, four coders independently coded each study, and the hazard data were coded independently from the rest of the data. 
To address the first question of interest, we recorded several pieces of information from our primary studies. 
First, we recorded the method of training used in each primary study. 
Specifically, following Burke et al.’s (2006) categorization, the method of training was initially divided into three groups: least engaging (e.g., lectures, films, reading materials, and video-based training), moderately engaging (e.g., programmed or computer-interface instruction with feedback), and most engaging (e.g., behavioral modeling, simulation, and hands-on training). 
If studies reported using more than one method of training, the most engaging level of training received by all participants was recorded. 
Because tests of hypotheses in this investigation focused on distinctions between the highly engaging forms of training and less engaging training, the latter of which does not include opportunities for action, dialogue, and considerable reflection (i.e., Burke et al.’s, 2006, least and moderately engaging methods of safety training), we collapsed the least engaging and moderately engaging categories into what we refer to as the less engaging methods. 
Second, changes in participants’ safety-related outcomes, our dependent variables, were coded. 
The dependent variables were safety-related knowledge acquisition (i.e., differences in test performance or self-reports between the target group and either a control group or a baseline measure) and behavioral safety performance (i.e., differences in observed or self-reported behaviors between the target group and either a control group or a baseline measure). 
In the cases where primary studies reported effects on both dependent variables, we coded both effects separately and included the effects in separate meta-analyses; no sample was represented more than once within a given meta-analysis. 
Also, when available, the reliability of the dependent variables was recorded (internal consistency reliability estimates for knowledge measures and, typically, interrater reliability estimates for performance measures). 
Third, to address our second research question, we coded hazards in the workplace. 
We began by using the U.S. 
Bureau of Labor Statistics’ Occupational Injury and Illness Classification System (OIICS) to sort hazards into seven categories that describe the manner in which an injury or illness is produced or inflicted by the source of the injury or illness (Biddle, 1998). 
An eighth category is reserved for other hazards that do not fit within the system. 
Within the OIICS, the seven categories are hierarchically arranged to reflect the increasing potential for severe illness, injury, or death due to the hazardous event or exposure: contact with objects (Category 1), falls (Category 2), bodily reaction and exertion (Category 3), exposure to harmful substances and environments (Category 4), transportation accidents (Category 5), fires and explosions (Category 6), and assaults and violent acts (Category 7). This hierarchical ordering of events/exposures roughly corresponds to the ordering of occupations and industries in terms of the number of nonfatal and fatal injuries within the Bureau of Labor Statistics annual workforce injury and illness reports. 
In this sense, this hazard scoring system does reflect, to a degree, the objective likelihood of injury or illness in terms of nonfatal and fatal injuries per thousand workers when an event/exposure occurs. 
When studies reported multiple hazards, we recorded the highest ranked event/exposure. 
In studies that did not explicitly state the type of hazard, we inferred the nature of the hazard based upon the content of the training intervention. 
Furthermore, the Bureau of Labor Statistics’ OIICS considers events involving transportation accidents, fires and explosions, and assaults and violent acts (i.e., Categories 5, 6, and 7) as taking precedence in terms of severity over all other categories. 
As discussed above, these types of events/exposures would be expected to, in combination with highly engaging training, induce dread and motivation to learn. 
In addition, Category 4, which concerns exposures to harmful substances (e.g., toxic chemicals, radiation) and environments (e.g., depletion of oxygen in enclosed, restricted, or confined spaces), would also be considered to be more ominous in nature. 
The remaining categories, consistent with the OIICS classification as hierarchically lower in terms of the seriousness (and likelihood) of event/exposure, would not necessarily be considered ominous in nature. 
Therefore, for the purposes of our analyses, we scored hazards within Categories 4, 5, 6, and 7 as one (high hazards) and hazards within Categories 1, 2, and 3 as zero (low hazards). 
In effect, this dichotomy allowed us to highlight the point at which the consequences of hazards go from typically being less severe (e.g., slips, overexertion, and repetitive motion within the third most severe hazard category: bodily reaction and exertion) to being more severe (e.g., the contraction of hepatitis or HIV resulting from needle sticks within the fourth most severe hazard category: exposure to harmful substances and environments). 
Notably, this scoring of hazardous event/exposure in terms of low and high severity roughly corresponds to splitting the Bureau of Labor’s ranking system at the midpoint of the OCIIS hierarchy. 
While we adopted this system for the scoring of workplace hazards, we recognize that fatalities can and do occur in relation to hazards classified as low hazards. 
Our scoring system and that of the OCIIS reflect the typical level of severity and likelihood associated with a hazardous exposure or event (e.g., most slips and falls are nonfatal). 
For level of engagement in safety training, we scored safety training as one (highly engaging training) or zero (less engaging 50 training) for tests of all hypotheses This scoring was dictated by our theoretical arguments in relation to the dread factor being engendered only within the highly engaging methods of training that encourage action, dialogue, and reflection (i.e., behavioral modeling, hands-on, and simulation-based training) and with respect to hazards of an ominous nature (i.e., those within the top four OCIIS categories). 
Intercoder agreement was very high (at least 90%) for the coding of both training intervention and hazardous event/exposure, and any disagreements were resolved by a third coder. 
In this manner, a consensus code was obtained for both the level of engagement of safety training and the nature of the hazardous event/exposure. 
Statistical Analyses To compute the effect of safety training for knowledge or safety performance, d statistics were computed using equations from Shadish, Robinson, and Lu (1999) and Lipsey and Wilson (2001). 
Using information provided in the primary studies, the majority of studies provided enough information to perform straightforward d-statistic calculations. 
Several studies, however, reported results in proportions or percentages or with respect to analysis of variance designs. 
For instance, in the case of proportions, we estimated d statistics via arcsine transformations (see Lipsey & Wilson, 2001). 
Importantly, for both single-group and independent-groups designs, we computed effect sizes to ensure that all effects were in the same raw-score effect-size metric (see Morris, 2008; Morris & DeShon, 2002). 
Given minimal differences in mean effects between single-group and independent-groups designs within the domain of workplace safety training (see Burke et al., 2006, for a detailed comparison of meta-analytic results for within- vs. between-subjects designs), we did not distinguish between study design features for the purposes of testing the present hypotheses. 
We note that in some cases, we computed effects different from the original study design due to insufficient reporting of data or data that would produce out-of-bound effect-size estimates. 
For instance, while Peterson, McGlothlin, and Blue’s (2004) study was based on pre–post design with a control group, the authors did not report findings for the control group, which necessitated treating this study as a within-subjects design. 
The meta-analysis procedure used was Raju, Burke, Normand, and Langlois’s ([RBNL] 1991) method. 
The RBNL method was chosen because of its ability to appropriately correct for unreliability in the measure of the dependent variable whenever a primary study reliability estimate was available and in whatever proportion reliabilities were available within a meta-analytic distribution of effects. 
Moreover, the RBNL meta-analytic procedure was chosen for its unique ability to estimate standard errors for individually corrected correlations with and without sample-based dependent variable reliabilities. 
To correct observed training effects when a primary study did not report a reliability estimate, we relied on the overall, sample-size weighted average reliability estimates for knowledge and performance measures of .73 and .88, respectively. 
In addition, the RBNL procedures permit the estimation of confidence intervals around mean corrected effects based on a random effects estimate of the standard error of the mean corrected effect. 
Due to statistical advantages of working with correlations (i.e., asymptotic estimates of standard errors for individually corrected effects can be made for correlation coefficients and appropriately defined standard errors can be computed for mean corrected correlations; see Burke & Landis, 2003; Raju & Brand, 2003), we converted observed d statistics to correlation coefficients before conducting the meta-analyses. 
For the purposes of this article, we report results in correlation form and, where appropriate in the Discussion section, we discuss these effects in terms of standardized differences (i.e., d statistics). 
Given the variances in the effect sizes in each of the eight Hazard Level ϫ Training Method distributions and noting the potential for outliers to have a large effect on these variances, we also conducted outlier analyses. 
Specifically, we used the sampleadjusted meta-analytic deviancy (SAMD; Huffcutt & Arthur, 1995) statistic to check for outliers in these distributions. 
Given potential bias in results based on the sole use of the SAMD statistic (see Beal, Corey, & Dunlap, 2002), we also examined how close the SAMD values were in determining whether an effect was a true outlier. 
In total, five studies were identified as outliers, and each outlier was from a different combination of training engagement and hazard level (i.e., one outlier was identified in each of five of the eight combinations of training engagement, hazard level, and safety-related outcome). 
On the basis of the inclusion criteria and the outlier analyses, we included a total of 113 primary studies that had 147 independent samples and 166 safety training effects, with a total sample size of 24,694 from 16 countries. 
Notably, the number of studies included in this investigation for tests of Hypotheses 1 and 2 represents a 45% increase over the number of studies with safety knowledge and safety performance as dependent measures included in Burke et al. (2006). 
For tests of Hypotheses 1 and 2, we compared estimated mean effects for less and highly engaging methods of safety training for knowledge and performance, respectively. 
We performed these tests to evaluate the consistency of our findings with the earlier reported meta-analysis by Burke et al. (2006). 
For tests of Hypotheses 3 and 4, we tested for the expected interaction within a meta-analytic context using the common subgrouping technique (see Hunter & Schmidt, 2004). 
This moderator detection technique is useful when considering dichotomous moderators and when independent variables are uncorrelated (see Steel & KammeyerMueller, 2002). 
In this regard, we note that the phi coefficient between training engagement and hazardous event/exposure was Ϫ.13 and statistically nonsignificant. 
When subgrouping studies, we first classified training effects into low and high hazardous event/exposure separately for knowledge and performance effects. 
Then, we computed the mean training effect (i.e., mean corrected correlation) for less engaging training and for highly engaging training within each hazard condition. 
When comparing mean effects for less and highly engaging training within a hazard condition, we examined whether the respective 95% confidence intervals (based on the random effects estimate of the standard error for the mean corrected correlation; see Burke & Landis, 2003) around the estimated mean effects overlapped. 
Importantly, we note that the standard error for the mean corrected effect included information on the standard errors for individually corrected effects within a distribution of effects, as well as information on the between-study variance in effects within that distribution. 
51 Results Table 1 lists the studies we included and coded in this metaanalysis along with some descriptive information. 
Table 2 presents a summary of the meta-analytic results examining the effects of safety training method on knowledge acquisition and safety performance. 
Among the results presented are the estimated mean correlations corrected for dependent variable unreliability (M ␳ ), the 95% confidence interval around the estimated mean (95% CI M ␳ ), and the estimated variance of the effects (V ␳ ). We also present parallel results based on uncorrected correlations in Table 2. As both sets of results are analogous and consistent with each other, we refer to the corrected (disattenuated) results in testing the hypotheses. 
According to Hypothesis 1, highly engaging training will be associated with greater safety knowledge acquisition, compared to less engaging training. 
As shown in Table 2, the mean training effect size, M ␳ , is greater when training method is highly engaging than when training method is less engaging (M ␳ ϭ .61 for the highly engaging methods compared to M ␳ ϭ .36 for the less engaging methods). 
The nonoverlapping 95% confidence intervals around M ␳ suggest that highly engaging methods are much more effective than the less engaging methods in increasing safety knowledge acquisition. 
Thus, Hypothesis 1 is supported. 
In addition, the results also provide support for Hypothesis 2. Highly engaging safety training is associated with a higher level of safety performance compared to less engaging training. 
With reference to Table 2, the average training effect size is greater when training method is highly engaging than when training method is less engaging (M ␳ ϭ .42 for the highly engaging methods compared to M ␳ ϭ .22 for the less engaging methods). 
As with safety knowledge, the nonoverlapping 95% confidence intervals around M ␳ suggest that highly engaging methods are much more effective than the less engaging methods in improving safety performance. 
Table 3 presents a summary of the meta-analytic results examining the interaction between training method and hazardous event/exposure. 
These results are consistent with Hypotheses 3 and 4. Hypothesis 3 predicts that the level of hazardous event/exposure in the work context will moderate the relationship between training engagement and knowledge acquisition, such that the relationships between level of engagement and training effectiveness will be stronger under high hazard conditions (i.e., when events/exposures have a greater potential of producing severe injury, illness, or death) than under low hazard conditions (i.e., when events and exposures in the occupational context are less likely to result in serious injury, illness, or death). 
In other words, in terms of safety knowledge acquisition, Hypothesis 3 predicts that the effectiveness of highly engaging training methods relative to the less engaging training methods will be amplified under high hazard conditions, as opposed to the low hazard conditions. 
For Hypothesis 3, the mean training effect size for the less engaging methods (M ␳ ϭ .53) is slightly greater than the mean effect for highly engaging methods (M ␳ ϭ .47) under the low hazard condition. 
Notably, the mean effect associated with the highly engaging methods (.47) is part of the 95% confidence interval around the mean effect associated with the less engaging methods, that is, [.37, .70]. 
Similarly, the mean effect of the less engaging methods (.53) falls within the 95% confidence interval around the mean effect associated with the highly engaging methods, [.33, .61]. 
Thus, although the mean effect of the less engaging methods is numerically greater than that of the more engaging methods under the low hazard condition, there is an insufficient statistical basis to conclude that the mean effect of .47 is significantly different from the mean effect of .53. 
Whereas we expected to see a modest increase in training effectiveness across levels of engagement within the low hazard condition, we did not see such an increase. 
On the other hand, under the high hazard condition, the mean training effect for highly engaging methods (M ␳ ϭ .65) is significantly higher than the mean training effect for less engaging methods (M ␳ ϭ .36), as evidenced by the nonoverlapping 95% confidence intervals ([.31, .41] for the less engaging methods and [.58, .71] for the highly engaging methods). 
Collectively, these pieces of evidence suggest that in terms of increasing safety knowledge, the effectiveness of highly engaging training methods relative to the less engaging training methods is more pronounced under conditions of high hazards than under conditions of low hazards. 
Thus, the meta-analytic data are consistent with Hypothesis 3. Analogously, Hypothesis 4 predicts that in terms of safety performance, the effectiveness of highly engaging training methods relative to the less engaging training methods will be amplified under high hazard conditions as opposed to the low hazard conditions. 
With reference to the safety performance meta-analytic results in Table 3, the mean training effect size for the less engaging methods (M ␳ ϭ .31) is essentially the same as the mean effect for highly engaging methods (M ␳ ϭ .32) under the low hazard condition. 
The mean effect associated with the less engaging methods falls within the 95% confidence interval, [.23, .41], around the mean effect for the highly engaging methods. 
Likewise, the mean effect associated with the highly engaging methods falls within the 95% confidence interval for the less engaging methods, [.24, .37]. 
These confidence intervals suggest that the two mean effects, .31 and .32, are not significantly different from each other. 
Here, too, we expected to see a modest increase in training effectiveness across levels of engagement within the low hazard condition; instead, we found no significant increase. 
In contrast, under the high hazard conditions, the mean training effect for highly engaging methods (M ␳ ϭ .46) is significantly higher than the mean training effect for less engaging methods (M ␳ ϭ .20), as evidenced by the nonoverlapping 95% confidence intervals ([.16, .25] for the less engaging methods and [.39, .53] for the highly engaging methods). 
Notably, the confidence interval around the mean effect of .46 for highly engaging training is outside (i.e., above) the confidence intervals for all other mean effects concerning safety performance. 
Taken together, these pieces of evidence suggest that in terms of enhancing safety performance, the effectiveness of highly engaging training methods relative to the less engaging training methods is more pronounced under conditions of high hazards than under conditions of low hazards. 
Hence, the meta-analytic evidence is consistent with Hypothesis 4. Discussion Our hypotheses for this investigation concern two issues: (a) the extent to which the level of training engagement in safety training influences knowledge acquisition and safety performance, and (b) 52 Table 1Studies Included in the Meta-Analysis Study N Country Study design a Participant occupation Method of safety training b Type of hazard Dependent variable reliability c Dependent variable Alavosius & Sulzer- Azaroff (1986) 6 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Direct care staff workers (for physicallyhandicapped clients) Written and verbal feedback Bodily reaction and exertion .89 Performance Albers et al. (1997) 34 USA Posttest only, comparison Carpenter apprentices Lecture, discussion, feedback, hands-on practice Bodily reaction and exertion Knowledge Al-Hemoud & Al-Asfoor (2006) 21 Kuwait Pre–post, w/control group Industrial engineers Feedback Bodily reaction and exertion .89 Performance Anger et al. (2006) 51 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Agricultural workforce (orchard workers) Computer-based programmed instruction Falls .90 Knowledge & performance Arcury, Quandt, Austin, Preisser, & Cabrera(1999) 270 USA Posttest only, comparison Farm workers Lecture, video Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Askari & Mehring (1992) 100 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Health care workers Feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Azizi et al. (2000) 72 Israel Pre–post, w/control group Outdoor water resources workers Lecture, slide presentation, brochures Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance Baker (1998) 6 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Direct care staff workers for clients with physicalor mental disabilities Videotaped segments and vignettes, discussion,hands-on/simulationtraining, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments 1.00 Performance Barnett et al. (1984) 110 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Farm workers Slideshow presentation, brochure Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Bosco & Wagner (1988) 209 USA Posttest only, comparison Auto manufacturing workers Lecture, videotape, computer- based training Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .66 Knowledge Brnich, Derick, Mallett, & Vaught (2002) 178 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Miners Lecture, discussion, video presentation Fires and explosions Knowledge Calabro, Weltge, Parnell, Kouzekanani, &Ramirez (1998) 172 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Medical students Lecture, discussion, behavioral modeling (role-play), case studies Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Caparaz, Rice, Graumlich, Radike, & Morawetz(1990) 9 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Foundry/maintenance workers Lecture, small group discussion, workbookexercises Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Carlton (1987) 30 USA Posttest only, comparison Food service employees Behavioral modeling, feedback Bodily reaction and exertion .96 Knowledge 30 USA Posttest only, comparison Food service employees Behavioral modeling, feedback Bodily reaction and exertion .96 Performance Carrabba, Field, Tormoehlen, & Talbert(2000) 212 USA Posttest only, comparison 4-H tractor program members Exercise, feedback Transportation accidents Performance Chaffin, Gallay, Wooley, & Kuciemba (1986) 26 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Warehouse employees Lecture, discussion, video Bodily reaction and exertion Performance (table continues) 53 Table 1 (continued) Study N Country Study design a Participant occupation Method of safety training b Type of hazard Dependent variable reliability c Dependent variable Chhokar & Wallin (1984) 58 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Heat exchanger manufacturing andrepairing plant workers Slideshow, feedback, goal- setting Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .93 Performance Cohen & Jensen (1984) 24 USA Pre–post, w/control group Lift truck operators (Warehouse 1) Behavioral modeling Transportation accidents .90 Performance 48 USA Pre–post, w/control group Lift truck operators (Warehouse 2) Behavioral modeling Transportation accidents Performance Cole et al. (1988) 36 USA Pre–post, w/control group Coal miners Task demonstration, hands-on training Fires and explosions Performance Coutts, Graham, Braun, & Wells (2000) 33 Canada Pre–post, w/o control group Bar staff Lecture, discussion, video, case study, exercises, roleplaying Assaults and violent acts Knowledge Curwick, Reeb-Whitaker, & Connon (2003) 30 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Various manufacturing- related occupations Hands-on (with simulation training) Bodily reaction and exertion Knowledge Daltroy et al. (1993) 178 USA Posttest only, comparison Postal workers Lecture, discussion, slides, hands-on training, feedbackon the job Bodily reaction and exertion Knowledge DeVries, Burnette, & Redmon (1991) 4 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing Feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .98 Performance Dortch & Trombly (1990) 12 USA Pre–post, w/control group Electronic assembly workers Lecture, discussion, handout Bodily reaction and exertion .83 Performance 11 USA Pre–post, w/control group Electronic assembly workers Lecture, discussion, handout, simulation Bodily reaction and exertion .83 Performance Eckerman et al. (2002) 60 USA Posttest only, comparison Various occupations Computer-based programmed instruction Exposure to harmful substance orenvironments Knowledge Eckerman et al. (2004) 73 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Food service workers at a hospital Behavioral modeling Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Engels, Van der Gulden, Senden, Kolk, &Binkhorst (1998) 18 Netherlands Pre–post, w/control group Nursing Feedback Bodily reaction and exertion Performance Ewigman, Kivlahan, Hosokawa, & Horman(1990) 94 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Firefighters Lecture, discussion, handouts, posters, video Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Finch & Daniel (2005) 276 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Emergency food relief organization workers Lecture/discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Forst et al. (2004) 239 USA Pre–post, w/control group Community health workers Hands-on (with simulation training) Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance 54 Table 1 (continued) Study N Country Study design a Participant occupation Method of safety training b Type of hazard Dependent variable reliability c Dependent variable Fox & Sulzer-Azaroff (1987) 12 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Paper mill foremen Feedback Bodily reaction and exertion .97 Performance Froom, Kristal-Boneh, Melamed, Shalom, &Ribak (1998) 167 Israel Pre–post, w/control group Medical students Lecture Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance Gagnon (2003) 10 Canada Pre–post, w/o control group Physical education students doing manualhandling Hands-on (with simulation training) Bodily reaction and exertion .80 Performance Gerbert et al. (1988) 99 USA Pre–post, w/control group Dentists Bulletins, discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Girgis, Sanson, & Watson (1994) 142 Australia Pre–post, w/control group Electrical company outdoor workers Lecture, discussion, pamphlets Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Goldrick (1989) 78 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nurses Computer-based programmed instruction Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .60 Knowledge 66 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nurses Lecture Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .60 Knowledge Greene, DeJoy, & Olejnik (2005) 82 USA Pre–post, w/control group University employees (computer users) Feedback Bodily reaction and exertion Performance Harrington & Walker (2002) 20 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Administrative staff at life-care communityfacility Instructor-led lecture and discussion (fire behaviormodule) Fires and explosions .79 Knowledge 42 USA Pre–post, w/control group Administrative staff at life-care communityfacility Computer-based programmed instruction (fire hazardmodule) Fires and explosions .72 Knowledge Harrington & Walker (2003) 37 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing facility staff Computer-based programmed instruction (need for firesafety module) Fires and explosions Knowledge 31 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing facility staff Instructor-led lecture and discussion (need for firesafety module) Fires and explosions Knowledge 44 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing facility staff Computer-based programmed instruction (human factorsin fire module) Fires and explosions Knowledge 38 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing facility staff Instructor-led lecture and discussion (human factorsin fire module) Fires and explosions Knowledge 40 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing facility staff Computer-based programmed instruction (fire emergencyplanning module) Fires and explosions Knowledge 36 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing facility staff Instructor-led lecture and discussion (fire emergencyplanning module) Fires and explosions Knowledge 31 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing facility staff Computer-based programmed instruction (fire safetydevices module) Fires and explosions Knowledge (table continues) 55 Table 1 (continued) Study N Country Study design a Participant occupation Method of safety training b Type of hazard Dependent variable reliability c Dependent variable 32 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing facility staff Instructor-led lecture and discussion (fire safetydevices module) Fires and explosions Knowledge Harrington & Walker (2004) 670 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Staff from a life-care community/nursingcommunity Computer-based programmed instruction Fires and explosions .76 Knowledge 624 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Staff from a life-care community/nursingcommunity Instructor-led lecture and discussion Fires and explosions Knowledge Held, Mygind, Wolff, Gynterlberg, & Agner(2002) 287 Denmark Pre–post, w/control group Wetwork employees Behavioral modeling Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance Hickman & Geller (2003) 15 USA Pre–post, w/control group Miners Feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .97 Knowledge Hong, Ronis, Lusk, & Kee (2006) 403 USA Pre–post, w/control group Engineers on construction sites Computer-based programmed instruction Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance Hopkins (1984) 6 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Plastics manufacturing plant workers Feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .99 Performance Huang et al. (2002) 98 China Pre–post, w/control group Hospital nurses Behavioral modeling Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Hultman, Nordin, & Ortengren (1984) 6 Sweden Pre–post, w/o control group Janitors Hands-on training (simulation), feedback Bodily reaction and exertion Performance Hurlebaus & Link (1997) 22 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nurses Discussion, handouts, behavioral modeling,hands-on training(supervised practice) Assaults and violent acts Knowledge Inman & Blanciforti (2002) 106 USA Pre–post, w/control group Carpenters Lecture, reminders, posters Contact with objects Performance Jensen & Friche (2007) 208 Denmark Pre–post, w/o control group Floor layers Hands-on (with simulation training) Bodily reaction and exertion Performance Johnsson, Carlosson, & Lagerstrom (2002) 49 Sweden Posttest only, comparison Hospital and home care personnel Feedback Bodily reaction and exertion .91 Performance Kerrigan et al. (2006) 206 Dominican Republic Pre–post, w/o control group Sex workers (Santo Domingo) Lecture/discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance 200 Dominican Republic Pre–post, w/o control group Sex workers (Puerto Plata) Lecture/discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance Knobloch & Broste (1998) 691 USA Pre–post, w/control group Agricultural workers Lecture, discussion, videos, behavioral prompts (e.g.,direct mailings), feedback,hands-on training(supervised practice) Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance 56 Table 1 (continued) Study N Country Study design a Participant occupation Method of safety training b Type of hazard Dependent variable reliability c Dependent variable Komaki, Barwick, & Scott (1978) 22 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Bakery workers (wrapping department) Slideshow, discussion, feedback Contact with objects .99 Performance 16 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Bakery workers (makeup department) Slideshow, discussion, feedback Contact with objects .97 Performance Komaki, Heinzmann, & Lawson (1980) 7 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Vehicle maintenance workers (sweeper repairsection) Slideshow, discussion, feedback Contact with objects .95 Performance 37 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Vehicle maintenance workers (preventivemaintenance section) Slideshow, discussion, feedback Contact with objects .95 Performance 7 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Vehicle maintenance workers (lightequipment repairsection) Slideshow, discussion, feedback Contact with objects .95 Performance 4 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Vehicle maintenance workers (heavyequipment repairsection) Slideshow, discussion, feedback Contact with objects .95 Performance Kowalski-Trakofler & Barrett (2003) 82 USA Posttest only, comparison Mining workers Lecture/discussion Contact with objects Knowledge Leslie & Adams (1973) 50 USA Pre–post, w/control group Unskilled workers Lecture, audiovisual presentation, discussion Contact with objects Performance Ludwig & Geller (1991) 60 USA Posttest only, comparison Pizza deliverers Discussion, store-based verbal reminders Transportation accidents .90 Performance Ludwig & Geller (1997) 29 USA Pre–post, w/control group Pizza deliverers Discussion, participative goal setting, feedback Transportation accidents .86 Performance 20 USA Pre–post, w/control group Pizza deliverers Lecture, (assigned) goal setting, feedback Transportation accidents .86 Performance Lueveswanij, Nittayananta, & Robison (2000) 139 Thailand Pre–post, w/control group Oral health personnel Lectures, videos, interviews with infected persons,behavioral demonstrations,role-plays Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Lusk et al. (2003) 878 USA Pre–post, w/control group Automotive factory workers Computer-based programmed instruction Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .89 Performance Luskin, Somers, Wooding, & Levenstein (1992) 20 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Hazardous waste site workers, emergencyresponders Lecture, group discussion, hands-on, participatoryexercises, simulation (mockincident) Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge P. Lynch et al. (1990) 717 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Hospital staff Slide presentation, discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .80 Knowledge 29 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Medical personnel Slide presentation, discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance 201 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing personnel Slide presentation, discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance (table continues) 57 Table 1 (continued) Study N Country Study design a Participant occupation Method of safety training b Type of hazard Dependent variable reliability c Dependent variable R. M. Lynch & Freund (2000) 104 USA Pre–post, w/control group Nursing, patient care 35-mm slideshow, hands-on equipment training,feedback Bodily reaction and exertion Knowledge & performance Ma et al. (2002) 815 China Pre–post, w/o control group Sex workers Lecture/discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Marsh & Kendrick (1998) 58 UK Pre–post, w/o control group Health care professionals Feedback Accidents/injuries Knowledge Martyny, Buchan, Keefe, & Blehm (1988) 19 USA Pre–post, w/control group Occupational health and safety officers Lecture Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Materna et al. (2002) 45 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Painting contractors Lecture, audiovisual presentation, discussion,behavioral modeling,hands-ontraining/simulation Exposure to harmful substance orenvironments Performance Mattila (1990) 38 Finland Pre–post, w/o control group Veneer refining and coating workers Feedback based on safety inspections Transportation accidents .89 Performance Mattila & Hyodynmaa (1988) 70 Finland Pre–post, w/o control group Construction workers (office building site) Feedback based on safety inspections Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .87 Performance 17 Finland Pre–post, w/o control group Construction workers (apartment building site) Feedback based on safety inspections Falls .87 Performance Mayer et al. (2007) 2,501 USA Pre–post, w/control group Postal service letter carriers Lecture/discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance McCauley (1990) 30 USA Pre–post, w/control group Groundskeepers and custodians Lecture, discussion, slideshow, simulated worksituations Bodily reaction and exertion Performance Michaels, Zoloth, Bernstein, Kass, &Schrier (1992) 170 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Carpenters Lecture, group discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge 367 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Construction laborers and pipe caulkers Lecture, group discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge 170 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Custodial assistants Lecture, group discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge 86 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Dental assistants, hygienists, and dentists Lecture, group discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge 177 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Electricians Lecture, group discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge 234 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Stationary engineers and high-pressure, planttenders Lecture, group discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge 58 Table 1 (continued) Study N Country Study design a Participant occupation Method of safety training b Type of hazard Dependent variable reliability c Dependent variable 160 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Plumbers Lecture, group discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge 147 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Print shop workers Lecture, group discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge 109 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Traffic device maintainers Lecture, group discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Na¨sa¨nen & Saari (1987) 32 Finland Pre–post, w/o control group Shipyard workers Slideshow, discussion, feedback Falls .88 Performance Nieuwenhuijsen (2004) 40 USA Posttest only, comparison Office workers employed in an administrativeoffice Hands-on (with simulation training) Bodily reaction and exertion Performance Parkinson et al. (1989) 297 USA & Canada Pre–post, w/control group Coke oven plant workers Lecture, discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Patros (2001) 30 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Health care workers Feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .99 Performance Perry & Layde (2003) 385 USA Posttest only, comparison Dairy farmers (certified pesticide applicators) Feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Peterson, McGlothlin, & Blue (2004) 35 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nursing assistants Lecture/discussion Bodily reaction and exertion Knowledge Poosanthanasarn, Lohachit, Fungladda, Sriborapa, &Pulkae (2005) 52 Thailand Pre–post, w/control group Metal auto-parts factory workers Lecture/discussion, feedback Bodily reaction and exertion Performance Porru et al. (1993) 50 Italy Pre–post, w/o control group Manufacturing plant workers Lecture, discussion, booklet of information Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Rasmussen et al. (2003) 201 Denmark Pre–post, w/control group Farm workers Lecture/discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .60 Performance Ray, Bishop, & Wang (1997) 41 USA Pre–post, w/control group Automobile manufacturing workers Visual presentation, discussion, feedback Contact with objects Performance Ray, Purswell, & Schlegel (1990) 200 USA Pre–post, w/control group Machinists, welders, general fittingtechnicians Discussion, feedback Contact with objects .98 Performance (table continues) 59 Table 1 (continued) Study N Country Study design a Participant occupation Method of safety training b Type of hazard Dependent variable reliability c Dependent variable Reber & Wallin (1984) 105 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Farm machinery manufacturing workers Lecture, slideshow, feedback, goal setting Falls .88 Performance Reber, Wallin, & Chhokar (1984) 105 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Sugar cane machinery manufacturing plantworkers Feedback based on observed levels of safe behavior Contact with objects .88 Performance Reed (2003) 26 USA Pre–post, w/o control group High school agricultural students Hands-on (with simulation training) Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance Robertson et al. (2002) 31 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Knowledge workers Hands-on (with simulation training) Bodily reaction and exertion Knowledge Rundio (1994) 33 USA Pre–post, w/control group Nurses Hands-on training, simulation Exposure to harmful substance orenvironments Knowledge Saari (1987) 18 Finland Pre–post, w/o control group Margarine factory workers Slide presentation, feedback Falls Performance Saari & Na¨sa¨nen (1989) 70 Finland Pre–post, w/o control group Shipyard workers Feedback Falls .91 Performance Sadler & Montgomery (1982) 8 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Military aviation maintenance personnel Lecture (standard lecture group) Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .90 Performance 8 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Military aviation maintenance personnel Lecture, feedback (leader- directed group) Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .90 Performance Seto, Ching, Chu, & Fielding (1990) 129 China (Hong Kong) Pre–post, w/control group Nurses Lecture Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Stave, Torner, & Eklof (2007) 26 Sweden Pre–post, w/o control group Agriculture/farming workers Lecture/discussion Transportation accidents Performance Stephens & Ludwig (2005) 7 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Nurses Feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance Streff, Kalsher, & Geller (1993) 51 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Machinists in electronics components plant Lecture, group discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments .90 Performance Symes, Graveling, & Campbell (1992) 139 UK Pre–post, w/o control group Coal miners Lecture Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Troup & Rauhala (1987) 198 Finland Posttest only, comparison Student nurses Lecture, videotaped selfevaluation, diary of patient-handling activities Bodily reaction and exertion .94 Performance 60 Table 1 (continued) Study N Country Study design a Participant occupation Method of safety training b Type of hazard Dependent variable reliability c Dependent variable Uwakwe (2000) 141 Nigeria Pre–post, w/control group Registered (student) nurses Lecture, discussion, multimedia presentations Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Vaught, Brinch, & Kellner (1988) 127 USA Posttest only, comparison Professional and technical employees Hands-on training Fires and explosions Performance 97 USA Posttest only, comparison Professional and technical employees Computer-based training Fires and explosions Performance Vela Acosta, Chapman, Bigelow, Kennedy, &Buchan (2005) 152 USA Pre–post, w/control group Migrant farm workers Feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Videman et al. (1989) 199 Finland Posttest only, comparison Nurses Lecture, feedback Bodily reaction and exertion Performance Wallen & Mulloy (2005) 14 USA Posttest only, comparison Factory workers (younger group) Computer-based programmed instruction Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge 16 USA Posttest only, comparison Factory workers (older group) Computer-based programmed instruction Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Wang, Fennie, He, Burgess, & Williams(2003) 91 China Pre–post, w/control group Student nurses Lecture, video, behavioral modeling Exposure to harmful substance orenvironments Knowledge & performance Wertz, Sorenson, Liebling, Kessler, & Heeren(1987) 1,247 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Health care workers (e.g., nurses, support staff, labtechnicians) Lecture, discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Whitby, Stead, & Najman (1991) 333 New Zealand Pre–post, w/o control group Hospital nursing staff Feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance J. H. Williams & Geller (2000) 97 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Manufacturing Lecture, discussion, feedback Bodily reaction and exertion Performance T. C. Williams & Zahed (1996) 27 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Chemical processors Lecture, discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge 27 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Chemical processors Computer-based training modules Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Wong et al. (1991) 186 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Physicians Lecture, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance Wu et al. (2002) 833 China Pre–post, w/control group Health professionals Behavioral modeling Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge Wynn & Black (1998) 96 USA Pre–post, w/o control group Medical flight crew personnel (nurses,paramedics) Lecture Fires and explosions Knowledge (table continues) 61 how hazardous event/exposure severity interacts with training engagement to influence these outcomes. 
Although we found a main effect for training in relation to knowledge acquisition and safety performance that was consistent with expectations from active approaches to learning (Bell & Kozlowski, 2008; Burke et al., 2006; Taylor et al., 2005), this finding was overshadowed by evidence of an interaction between the level of training engagement and hazardous event/exposure. 
More specifically, highly engaging training is considerably more effective in promoting safety knowledge and safety performance than less engaging training, particularly when the severity level of hazardous event/ exposure is high. 
When hazardous event/exposure severity is low, less engaging training approaches appear to be as effective as those that are highly engaging. 
This interaction effect is consistent with theoretical arguments based on dialogical theories of experiential learning and, at the same time, suggests that low hazards constitute a boundary condition for the effectiveness of training engagement. 
The scientific and practical implications of these findings are discussed below. 
Training Engagement Our findings indicate that, on average, the highly engaging methods of safety training are considerably more effective than the less engaging methods of training in knowledge acquisition and safety performance. 
Scientifically, these findings provide further support for conceptual arguments within experiential learning theories concerning enhancements in learning that result from action, dialogue, and reflection. 
From a practical perspective, these findings suggest the need for safety managers to more carefully consider the relative costs and benefits of placing a trainee in a passive versus more active type of safety training for knowledge acquisition and performance enhancement. 
In particular, although distance learning and electronic learning (e-learning) approaches to training offer economies of scale and may appear cost effective from a short-term financial perspective, a lack of participant engagement in such training approaches has been acknowledged as a major issue (Derouin, Fritzsche, & Salas, 2005). 
Given the importance of knowledge and performance as outcomes of safety training, balancing training engagement with the short-term financial costs becomes critical both to keeping workers safe and to avoiding the long-term financial costs of safety-related disasters, including the aforementioned deadly explosion at the Upper Big Branch mine in West Virginia. 
We note that our findings for the relative effectiveness of less versus highly engaging forms of safety training are stronger and more robust than the respective uncorrected study effects reported in Robson et al. (2010). 
These differences in findings are likely, in part, due to the highly selective sampling of studies (16 of which entered the final analyses compared to our analysis of 113 studies) and second-order sampling error introduced in Robson et al. Importantly, the present findings offer the most comprehensive scientific findings concerning the relative effectiveness of training engagement to date and serve to inform evidence-based policy on worker safety training with respect to highly hazardous work conditions. 
To underscore the importance of more informed policy and practice related to worker safety training, one need only look at recent news headlines concerning work safety training for the largest oil spill recovery effort in U.S. history. 
For instance, David Table 1 (continued) Study N Country Study design a Participant occupation Method of safety training b Type of hazard Dependent variable reliability c Dependent variable Yarrall (1986) 73 New Zealand Pre–post, w/control group Unspecified worksite employees (Worksite B) Lecture, audiovisual presentation, discussion Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance 67 New Zealand Pre–post, w/control group Unspecified worksite employees (Worksite C) Feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Knowledge & performance Yassi et al. (2001) 204 Canada Pre–post, w/control group Health care workers Problem-based, hands-on training/practice withequipment Bodily reaction and exertion Performance Zohar, Cohen, & Azar (1980) 76 Israel Pre–post, w/control group Metal fabrication plant workers Lecture, discussion, feedback Exposure to harmful substances orenvironments Performance Note. 
N ϭ sample size relevant to the respective effect size.a Study design for the purpose of estimating the effect size is not necessarily the same as the actual study design. 
Designs were reconsidered in some cases to deal with comparison groups that did not serve as reasonable control groups, with a lack of data on pre–post change for the control group, and with substantively range restricted pretest data that would create out-of-bound effect sizeestimates. 
b The level of engagement of safety training was based on the most engaging training method incorporated into a study design. 
c The sample-size weighted average reliability for the respective knowledge and performance reliabilities was substituted for missing study reliabilities. 
These mean reliability values were .73 for knowledge and .88 for performance. 
62 Michaels, Assistant Secretary of Labor for the Occupational Safety and Health Administration, was quoted as saying, “We have reports that some [in reference to British Petroleum’s oil recovery safety training programs] are offering training in significantly fewer than 40 hours, showing video presentations instead of requiring hands-on training and offering only limited instruction” (Mirza, 2010, p. 1). These workers’ insufficient training was reflected in their behaviors: some of the clean-up workers were reportedly working without gloves and in their regular clothes, meaning not only that they were likely coming into direct contact with contaminants but that they were then probably bringing these contaminants into their homes on their clothes. 
We comment more and qualify our comments on the policy and practice implications of our results below in relation to findings for Hypotheses 3 and 4, which pertain to the interaction of training engagement and hazardous event/exposure severity on training effectiveness. 
The Interaction of Training Engagement and Hazardous Event/Exposure Severity An important finding from this study is that hazardous event/ exposure severity interacted with training engagement to, on average, produce increased learning and performance when hazardous event/exposure severity was high and training was highly engaging. 
The primary psychological mechanism we offer as an explanation for this effect is the dread factor, the realization of the dangers associated with ominous hazards and the experienced feelings that one has about the possibility of such events/ exposures. 
This affective reaction and realization of threat severity is, in turn, expected to promote the motivation to learn more about such hazards and how to avoid them, as well as motivation for transferring such knowledge to the work setting. 
Our argument is consistent with the considerable amount of research on the functional nature of affect and emotions. 
Our theorizing on how the dread factor develops involves the social and experiential construction of affect and understanding of threat severity. 
As such, our theorizing and empirical findings uniquely contribute to research on learning in safety contexts, as well as to research on why and how workers transfer knowledge to the work setting in terms of dealing with hazards of an ominous nature. 
Consistent with our theorizing and findings, people become more pessimistic in their predictions about negative outcomes when they are able to reflect on or imagine the experience of such Table 2 Safety and Health Training Method Meta-Analysis Results in Correlation Form Training method Nk Uncorrected Disattenuated M r 95% CI M r V r M ␳ 95% CI M ␳ V ␳ Safety knowledge Less engaging methods 10,073 60 .31 [.27, .35] .020 .36 [.32, .41] .029 Highly engaging methods 1,848 15 .52 [.46, .59] .011 .61 [.54, .68] .014 Safety performance Less engaging methods 10,214 69 .20 [.17, .24] .015 .22 [.18, .25] .017 Highly engaging methods 2,559 22 .39 [.34, .45] .013 .42 [.36, .48] .015 Note. 
N ϭ total number of individuals; k ϭ number of study effects; M r ϭ sample-size weighted mean uncorrected correlation; 95% CI M r ϭ 95% confidence interval around the estimated M r ; V r ϭ variance of uncorrected effects; M ␳ ϭ sample-size weighted mean correlation corrected for dependent variable unreliability (mean rho); 95% CI M ␳ ϭ 95% confidence interval around the estimated M ␳ ; V ␳ ϭ variance of corrected effects. 
Table 3 Hazardous Event/Exposure Severity Level by Training Method Results in Correlation Form Hazard level/training method Nk Uncorrected Disattenuated M r 95% CI M r V r M ␳ 95% CI M ␳ V ␳ Safety knowledge Low hazard Less engaging methods 250 4 .45 [.31, .60] .011 .53 [.37, .70] .016 Highly engaging methods 407 6 .41 [.28, .54] .019 .47 [.33, .61] .019 High hazard Less engaging methods 9,823 56 .31 [.27, .35] .020 .36 [.31, .41] .028 Highly engaging methods 1,441 9 .55 [.50, .61] .004 .65 [.58, .71] .006 Safety performance Low hazard Less engaging methods 1,462 28 .29 [.23, .35] .011 .31 [.24, .37] .014 Highly engaging methods 841 10 .31 [.22, .39] .010 .32 [.23, .41] .011 High hazard Less engaging methods 8,752 41 .19 [.15, .23] .014 .20 [.16, .25] .016 Highly engaging methods 1,718 12 .44 [.37, .50] .009 .46 [.39, .53] .010 Note. 
N ϭ total number of individuals; k ϭ number of study effects; M r ϭ sample-size weighted mean uncorrected correlation; 95% CI M r ϭ 95% confidence interval around the estimated M r ; V r ϭ variance of uncorrected effects; M ␳ ϭ sample-size weighted mean correlation corrected for dependent variable unreliability (mean rho); 95% CI M ␳ ϭ 95% confidence interval around the estimated M ␳ ; V ␳ ϭ variance of corrected effects. 
63 an outcome (Sanna, 1999), and research suggests that a pessimistic outlook may be wiser in preparing for and responding to possible negative outcomes (Rundmo, 2000; Sweeny & Shepperd, 2007). 
In effect, workers in safety contexts where a hazardous exposure or event is regarded as serious or consequential (relative to illness, disease, or death) may be harnessing the benefits of negative states (such as negative affect) to prepare for and prompt action to avoid the negative outcomes. 
In doing so, they are engaging in safe work behavior. 
Furthermore, we note two interesting and unanticipated findings. 
First, in the low hazard condition, the less and highly engaging forms of training had comparable mean effects for both knowledge acquisition and safety performance. 
These findings may have been affected to some degree by the second-order sampling of studies. 
This point is especially relevant for the two knowledgeacquisition mean effects in the low hazard severity condition, which are based on relatively small numbers of studies and have wide confidence intervals. 
These confidence intervals are 2 to 3 times as wide as the respective confidence intervals in the high hazard condition, where the latter intervals are based on larger numbers of studies. 
Nevertheless, the overall pattern of findings across the two dependent variable categories, knowledge acquisition and safety performance, is noteworthy. 
Substantively, this pattern of findings suggests a potential boundary condition for the usefulness of highly engaging forms of training. 
That is, when hazard severity is low, more standardized and less socially engaging training methods may be sufficient to efficaciously produce desired or optimal training outcomes. 
More research comparing less and highly engaging forms of training under low hazard severity conditions with respect to safety and health knowledge and performance as the dependent variables is needed before one can be more confident in concluding that there is a possible boundary condition for training engagement. 
Another interesting finding is that the lowest effects for knowledge acquisition or safety performance were in the high hazard, low training engagement conditions. 
There are perhaps two related explanations for this pattern of findings. 
First, properly dealing with hazards that have severe injury or illness potential may require more procedural knowledge and skill development (e.g., using a self-contained breathing apparatus for dealing with radiological waste) than working with hazards that have lower potential for severe injury (e.g., using a loose-fitting disposable face mask when painting). 
As discussed above and consistent with our general findings concerning the effect of more versus less engaging forms of training, less engaging forms of training (e.g., a lecture, a pamphlet) would not necessarily lead to the development of more advanced procedural knowledge and skill needed within an area such as respiratory protection. 
Second, in line with our arguments related to the social construction of dread and an understanding of threat vulnerability, less engaging forms of training (with respect to hazards with severe injury/illness potential) may inappropriately signal that hazards and threat vulnerability are minor when in fact that they are not. 
The result being a potential backlash effect where the motivation to acquire the procedural knowledge and skill for handling such hazards is deflated. 
From a practical perspective, our findings in regard to the dread factor are important. 
Given the breadth of occupations and industries included in this meta-analysis and noting that these findings apply to workers in over 16 countries, the observed learning and performance differences between less engaging and highly engaging training in the high hazardous event/exposure condition have broad implications for the design and delivery of safety-related interventions on a worldwide basis. 
That is, efforts to increase the capacity of private sector and public sector workers to deal with hazards of an ominous nature, such as those relating to emergency events and exposures to highly hazardous substances, would be well advised to consider the potential benefits of highly engaging forms of training when hazard event/exposure is high. 
We offer this observation noting that when work involves dealing with hazards of an ominous nature, workers are not necessarily receiving and experiencing the benefits of highly engaging training. 
While our observation is based on the fact that the number of training evaluation studies in the literature is much lower for highly engaging safety training in comparison to less engaging types of training, we note that this observation is also consistent with literature indicating that safety training is not more prevalent in occupations and industries where workers face potential exposure to hazards with severe injury potential (Smith & Mustard, 2007). 
Potential Limitations and Directions for Future Research While we have relied on dialogical theories of experiential theories of learning as the basis for our psychological mechanisms and hypotheses, we recognize that this proposed psychological mechanism for our findings is an unmeasured variable. 
Thus, alternative explanatory mechanisms might be proposed for the obtained effects. 
We encourage research and, in particular, experimental studies that attempt to test expectations in relation to the dread factor and to measure affective and motivationally relevant cognitions that serve as mediating variables in our causal arguments. 
Another potential limitation of this investigation is that we did not have adequate data to control for several factors (e.g., sex and position within organization) that are known to influence risk perceptions. 
For many of the studies, with the exception of several studies and samples within the health care sector (e.g., nursing), the samples were predominantly male. 
Likewise, the samples in our studies were predominantly line workers, with few safety training studies involving managers. 
Furthermore, while our studies were based in over 16 different countries, studies from the United States dominated the set. 
As safety training continues on a worldwide basis, a useful future research direction would be to consider the joint influence of national cultural values, training engagement, and hazards on safety knowledge acquisition and performance. 
This suggestion is made based on some evidence that cultural values such as uncertainty avoidance are related to training engagement (Burke, ChanSerafin, Salvador, Smith, & Sarpy, 2008). 
That is, as uncertainty avoidance increases, the level of training engagement decreases. 
This effect is expected to be due to organizations in cultures that place a high value on avoiding uncertainty tending to favor more structured, less engaging approaches to safety training. 
In terms of future research concerning the role of work context and environment (i.e., hazardous event/exposure), we believe the hazard scoring system employed in this investigation has reasonable potential for advancing the understanding of effects associ64 ated with physical hazards in many types of work environments. 
The present hazard scoring system relies on the dichotomization of hazards as low and high relative to an available and standardized (across industries and occupations) hierarchy of workplace hazards. 
Notably, this system is flexible in the sense of permitting gradations in hazard categorization for up to seven hierarchically ordered categories should a researcher’s question call for the consideration of more fine-grained hazard distinctions. 
To our knowledge, the hazard scoring system within this research (i.e., the Bureau of Labor Statistics’ OIICS) has not been employed in other behavioral, management, or pubic health research to examine effects associated with hazardous work environments. 
Typically, hazards are recognized in these literatures but are infrequently scored and examined as situational variables. 
Notable exceptions include the O*NET work context ratings, which reflect job analysts’ ratings of potential exposure to job hazards (see Strong, Jeanneret, McPhail, Blakley, & D’Egidio, 1999), and the idiosyncratic trade association scheme reported by Sinclair et al. (2003). 
Conclusion The current study demonstrates the interactive influence of the level of engagement of safety training and hazard event/exposure severity on the development of safety knowledge and performance. 
Importantly, in relation to knowledge acquisition and safety performance, we have found that highly engaging safety training is more effective than less engaging safety training when hazardous event/exposure severity is high, whereas highly and less engaging safety training have comparable levels of effectiveness when hazardous event/exposure severity is low. 
More broadly, we hope, in conducting this study, not only that we have contributed to an understanding of the role that work context (i.e., workplace hazards) plays in relation to different levels of active learning to improve worker safety but that we have also underscored the value of a social constructionist lens to studying workplace safety. 
References References marked with an asterisk indicate studies included in the meta-analysis. 
*Alavosius, M. P., & Sulzer-Azaroff, B. (1986). 
The effects of performance feedback on the safety of client lifting and transfer. 
Journal of Applied Behavior Analysis, 19, 261–267. 
doi:10.1901/jaba.1986.19-261 *Albers, J. T., Li, Y., Lemasters, G., Sprague, S., Stinson, R., & Bhattacharya, A. (1997). 
An ergonomic education and evaluation program for apprentice carpenters. 
American Journal of Industrial Medicine, 32, 641–647. 
doi:10.1002/(SICI)1097-0274(199712)32:6Ͻ641::AIDAJIM10Ͼ3.0.CO;2-1 *Alexandre, N. M., Moraes, M. A., Filho, H. C., & Jorge, S. A. (2001). 
Evaluation of a program to reduce back pain in nursing personnel. 
Revisita de Saude Publica, 35, 356–361. 
doi:10.1590/S003489102001000400004 *Al-Hemoud, A. M., & Al-Asfoor, M. M. (2006). 
A behavior based safety approach at a Kuwait research institution. 
Journal of Safety Research, 37, 201–206. 
doi:10.1016/j.jsr.2005.11.006 *Anger, K. W., Stupfel, J., Ammerman, T., Tamulinas, A., Bodner, T., & Rohlman, D. (2006). 
The suitability of computer-based training for workers with limited formal education: A case study from the U.S. agricultural sector. 
International Journal of Training and Development, 10, 269–284. 
doi:10.1111/j.1468-2419.2006.00260.x *Arcury, T. A., Quandt, S. A., Austin, C. K., Preisser, J., & Cabrera, L. F. (1999). 
Implementation of EPA’s Worker Protection Standard training for agricultural laborers: An evaluation using North Carolina data. 
Public Health Reports, 114, 459–468. 
doi:10.1093/phr/114.5.459 *Askari, E., & Mehring, J. (1992). 
Human immunodeficiency virus/ acquired immunodeficiency syndrome training from a union perspective. 
American Journal of Industrial Medicine, 22, 711–720. 
doi: 10.1002/ajim.4700220509 *Azizi, E., Flint, P., Sadetzki, S., Solomon, A., Lerman, Y., Harari, G., & Rosenberg, L. (2000). 
A graded work site intervention program to improve sun protection and skin cancer awareness in outdoor workers in Israel. 
Cancer Causes and Control, 11, 513–521. 
doi:10.1023/A: 1008970224998 *Baker, D. J. (1998). 
Effects of video-based staff training with managerled exercises in residential support. 
Mental Retardation, 36, 198–204. 
doi:10.1352/0047-6765(1998)036Ͻ0198:EOVSTWϾ2.0.CO;2 Barke, R., Jenkins-Smith, H., & Slovic, P. (1997). 
Risk perceptions of men and women scientists. 
Social Science Quarterly, 78, 167–176. 
*Barnett, P. G., Midtling, J. E., Velasco, A. R., Romero, P., O’Malley, M., Clements, C., & Barbaccia, J. C. (1984). 
Educational intervention to prevent pesticide-induced illness of field workers. 
Journal of Family Practice, 19, 123–125. 
Barton, M. A., & Sutcliffe, K. M. (2009). 
Overcoming dysfunctional momentum: Organizational safety as a social achievement. 
Human Relations, 62, 1327–1356. 
doi:10.1177/0018726709334491 Baumeister, R. F., Vohs, K. D., DeWall, C. N., & Zhang, L. (2007). 
How emotion shapes behavior: Feedback, anticipation, and reflection, rather than direct causation. 
Personality and Social Psychology Review, 11, 167–203. 
doi:10.1177/1088868307301033 Beal, D. J., Corey, D. M., & Dunlap, W. P. (2002). 
On the bias of Huffcutt and Arthur’s (1995) procedure for identifying outliers in the metaanalysis of correlations. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 87, 583–589. 
doi:10.1037/0021-9010.87.3.583 Beer, J. S., Heerey, E. A., Keltner, D., Scabini, D., & Knight, R. T. (2003). 
The regulatory function of self-conscious emotion: Insights from patients with orbitofrontal damage. 
Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 85, 594–604. 
doi:10.1037/0022-3514.85.4.594 Bell, B. S., & Kozlowski, S. W. J. (2008). 
Active learning: Effects of core training design elements on self-regulatory processes, learning, and adaptability. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 93, 296–316. 
doi:10.1037/ 0021-9010.93.2.296 Biddle, E. (1998). 
Development and application of an occupational injury and illness classification system. 
In J. Stellman (Ed.), Encyclopaedia of occupational safety and health: Vol. 
1. The body—Health care— Management and policy—Tools and approaches (4th ed., pp. 32.12– 32.18). 
Geneva, Switzerland: International Labour Office. 
*Bosco, J., & Wagner, J. (1988). 
A comparison of the effectiveness of interactive laser disc and classroom video tape for safety instruction of General Motors workers. 
Educational Technology, 28, 15–22. 
Brewer, N. T., Chapman, G. B., Gibbons, F. X., Gerrard, M., McCaul, K. D., & Weinstein, N. D. (2007). 
Meta-analysis of the relationship between risk perception and health behavior: The example of vaccination. 
Health Psychology, 26, 136–145. 
doi:10.1037/0278-6133.26.2.136 *Brnich, M. J., Derick, R. L., Mallett, L., & Vaught, C. (2002). 
Innovative alternatives to traditional classroom health and safety training. 
In R. H. Peters (Ed.), Strategies for improving miners’ training (pp. 
19–25). 
Washington, DC: U.S. 
Department of Health and Human Services. 
Burke, M. J., Chan-Serafin, S., Salvador, R., Smith, A., & Sarpy, S. A. (2008). 
The role of national culture and organizational climate in safety training effectiveness. 
European Journal of Work and Organizational Psychology, 17, 133–152. 
doi:10.1080/13594320701307503 Burke, M. J., & Landis, R. (2003). 
Methodological and conceptual challenges in conducting meta-analyses. 
In K. Murphy (Ed.), Validity generalization: A critical review (pp. 
287–309). 
Mahwah, NJ: Erlbaum. 
Burke, M. J., Sarpy, S. A., Smith-Crowe, K., Chan-Serafin, S., Salvador, 65 R. O., & Islam, G. (2006). 
Relative effectiveness of worker safety and health training methods. 
American Journal of Public Health, 96, 315– 324. 
doi:10.2105/AJPH.2004.059840 Burke, M. J., Scheurer, M. L., & Meredith, R. J. (2007). 
A dialogical approach to skill development: The case of safety and health skills. 
Human Resource Management Review, 17, 235–250. 
doi:10.1016/ j.hrmr.2007.04.004 *Calabro, K., Weltge, A., Parnell, S., Kouzekanani, K., & Ramirez, E. (1998). 
Intervention for medical students: Effective infection control. 
American Journal of Infection Control, 26, 431–436. 
doi:10.1016/ S0196-6553(98)70041-0 *Caparaz, A., Rice, C., Graumlich, S., Radike, M., & Morawetz, J. (1990). 
Development and pilot evaluation of a health and safety training program for foundry workers. 
Applied Occupational and Environmental Hygiene, 5, 595–603. 
*Carlton, R. S. (1987). 
The effects of body mechanics instruction on work performance. 
American Journal of Occupational Therapy, 41, 16–20. 
*Carrabba, J. J., Field, W. E., Tormoehlen, R. L., & Talbert, B. A. (2000). 
Effectiveness of the Indiana 4-H Tractor Program at instilling safe tractor operating behaviors and attitudes in youth. 
Journal of Agricultural Safety and Health, 6, 179–189. 
*Chaffin, D. B., Gallay, L. S., Wooley, C. B., & Kuciemba, S. R. (1986). 
An evaluation of the effect of a training program on worker lifting postures. 
International Journal of Industrial Ergonomics, 1, 127–136. 
doi:10.1016/0169-8141(86)90016-8 *Chhokar, J. S., & Wallin, J. A. (1984). 
A field study of the effect of feedback frequency on performance. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 69, 524–530. 
doi:10.1037/0021-9010.69.3.524 *Cohen, H. H., & Jensen, R. C. (1984). 
Measuring the effectiveness of an industrial lift truck safety training program. 
Journal of Safety Research, 15, 125–135. 
doi:10.1016/0022-4375(84)90023-9 *Cole, B. L., Mallet, L. G., Haley, J. V., Berger, P. K., Lacefield, W. E., Wasielewski, R. D., & Wala, A. M. (1988). 
Research and evaluation methods for measuring nonroutine mine health and safety skills (Vol. 
1). Pittsburgh, PA: U.S. 
Bureau of Mines. 
Colquitt, J. A., LePine, J. A., & Noe, R. A. (2000). 
Toward an integrative theory of training motivation: A meta-analytic path analysis of 20 years of research. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 85, 678 –707. 
doi:10.1037/ 0021-9010.85.5.678 Cooper, M. (2010, April 10). 
In mine safety, a meek watchdog. 
The New York Times. 
Retrieved from http://www.nytimes.com *Coutts, M. C., Graham, K., Braun, K., & Wells, S. (2000). 
Results of a pilot program for training bar staff in preventing aggression. 
Journal of Drug Education, 30, 171–191. 
doi:10.2190/HFDB-3XDG-59D1-GG8P *Craib, K. J., Hackett, G., Back, C., Cvitkovich, Y., & Yassee, A. (2007). 
Injury rates, predictors of workplace injuries, and results of an intervention program among community health workers. 
Public Health Nursing, 24, 121–131. 
doi:10.1111/j.1525-1446.2007.00616.x Cunliffe, A. L. (2002). 
Reflexive dialogical practice in management learning. 
Management Learning, 33, 35–61. 
doi:10.1177/1350507602331002 *Curwick, C. C., Reeb-Whitaker, C. K., & Connon, C. L. (2003). 
Reaching managers at an industry association conference: Evaluation of ergonomics training. 
AAOHN Journal, 51, 464–469. 
*Daltroy, L. H., Iversen, M. D., Larson, M. G., Ryan, J., Zwerling, Z., Fossel, A. H., & Liang, M. H. (1993). 
Teaching and social support: Effects on knowledge, attitudes, and behaviors to prevent low back injuries in industry. 
Health Education Quarterly, 20, 43–62. 
Derouin, R. E., Fritzsche, B. A., & Salas, E. (2005). 
E-learning in organizations. 
Journal of Management, 31, 920–940. 
doi:10.1177/ 0149206305279815 *DeVries, J. E., Burnette, M. M., & Redmon, K. (1991). 
AIDS prevention: Improving nurses’ compliance with glove wearing through performance feedback. 
Journal of Applied Behavior Analysis, 24, 705–711. 
doi: 10.1901/jaba.1991.24-705 *Donaldson, C. S., Stranger, L. M., Donaldson, J. C., & Skubick, D. L. (1993). 
A randomized crossover investigation of a back pain and disability prevention program: Possible mechanisms of change. 
Journal of Occupation Rehabilitation, 3, 83–94. 
doi:10.1007/BF01078161 *Dortch, H. L., & Trombly, C. A. (1990). 
The effects of education on hand use with industrial workers in repetitive jobs. 
American Journal of Occupational Therapy, 44, 777–782. 
*Eckerman, D. A., Abrahamson, K., Ammerman, T., Fercho, H., Rohlman, D., & Anger, K. (2004). 
Computer-based training for food services workers at a hospital. Journal of Safety Research, 35, 317–327. 
doi: 10.1016/j.jsr.2003.11.008 *Eckerman, D. A., Lundeen, C. A., Steel, A., Fercho, H. L., Ammerman, T. A., & Anger, W. K. (2002). 
Interactive training versus reading to teach respiratory response. 
Journal of Occupational Health Psychology, 7, 313–323. 
doi:10.1037/1076-8998.7.4.313 *Engels, J. A., Van der Gulden, J. W. J., Senden, T. F., Kolk, J. J., & Binkhorst, R. A. (1998). 
The effects of an ergonomic-educational course: Postural load, perceived physical exertion, and biomechanical errors in nursing. 
International Archives of Occupational and Environmental Health, 71, 336–342. 
doi:10.1007/s004200050289 *Ewigman, B. G., Kivlahan, C. H., Hosokawa, M. C., & Horman, D. (1990). 
Efficacy of an intervention to promote use of hearing protective devices by firefighters. 
Public Health Reports, 105, 53–59. 
*Finch, C., & Daniel, E. (2005). 
Food safety knowledge and behavior of emergency food relief organization workers: Effects of food safety training intervention. 
Journal of Environmental Health, 9, 30–34. 
Fleming, M., Flin, R., Mearns, K., & Gordon, R. (1998). 
Risk perception of offshore workers on U.K. oil and gas platforms. 
Risk Analysis, 18, 103–110. 
doi:10.1111/j.1539-6924.1998.tb00920.x *Forst, L., Lacey, S., Chen, H. Y., Jimenez, R., Bauer, S., Skinner, S., & Conroy, L. (2004). 
Effectiveness of community health workers for promoting use of safety eyewear by Latino farm workers. 
American Journal of Industrial Medicine, 46, 607–613. 
doi:10.1002/ajim.20103 *Fox, C. J., & Sulzer-Azaroff, B. (1987). 
Increasing completion of accident reports. 
Journal of Safety Research, 18, 65–71. 
doi:10.1016/00224375(87)90086-7 *Froom, P., Kristal-Boneh, E., Melamed, S., Shalom, A., & Ribak, J. (1998). 
Prevention of needle-stick injury by the scooping-resheathing method. 
American Journal of Industrial Medicine, 34, 15–19. 
doi:10.1002/(SICI)1097-0274(199807)34:1Ͻ15::AID-AJIM3Ͼ3.0 .CO;2-P *Gagnon, M. (2003). 
The efficacy of training for three manual handling strategies based on the observation of expert and novice workers. 
Clinical Biomechanics, 18, 601–611. 
doi:10.1016/S0268-0033(03)00076-7 *Gerbert, B., Maguier, B., Badner, V., Greenspan, D., Greenspan, J., Barnes, D., & Carlton, R. (1988). 
Changing dentists’ knowledge, attitudes, and behaviors relating to AIDS: A controlled educational intervention. 
Journal of the American Dental Association, 51, 668–672. 
*Girgis, A., Sanson, R. W., & Watson, A. (1994). 
A workplace intervention for increasing outdoor workers’ use of solar protection. 
American Journal of Public Health, 84, 77–81. 
doi:10.2105/AJPH.84.1.77 *Goldrick, B. A. (1989). 
Programmed instruction revisited: A solution to infection control in service education. 
Journal of Continuing Education in Nursing, 20, 222–227. 
Greenberg, M. R., & Schneider, D. F. (1995). 
Gender differences in risk perception: Effects differ in stressed vs. non-stressed environments. 
Risk Analysis, 15, 503–511. 
doi:10.1111/j.1539-6924.1995.tb00343.x *Greene, B. L., DeJoy, D. M., & Olejnik, S. (2005). 
Effects of an active ergonomics training program on risk exposure, worker beliefs, and symptoms in computer users. 
Work, 24, 41–52. 
Hacker, W. (2003). 
Action regulation theory: A practical tool for the design of modern work processes? 
European Journal of Work and Organizational Psychology, 12, 105–130. 
doi:10.1080/13594320344000075 66 Hansen, C. D. (1995). 
Occupational cultures: Whose frame are we using? 
Journal for Quality and Participation, 18, 60–64. 
*Harrington, S. S., & Walker, B. L. (2002). 
A comparison of computerbased and instructor-led training for long-term care staff. 
Journal of Continuing Education in Nursing, 33, 39–45. 
*Harrington, S. S., & Walker, B. L. (2003). 
Is computer-based instruction an effective way to present fire safety training to long-term care staff? 
Journal for Nurses in Staff Development, 19, 147–154. 
doi:10.1097/ 00124645-200305000-00007 *Harrington, S. S., & Walker, B. L. (2004). 
The effects of computer-based training on immediate and residual learning of nursing facility staff. 
Journal of Continuing Education in Nursing, 35, 154–163. 
*Held, E., Mygind, K., Wolff, C., Gynterlberg, F., & Agner, T. (2002). 
Prevention of work related skin problems: An intervention study in wet work employees. 
Occupational and Environmental Medicine, 59, 556– 561. 
doi:10.1136/oem.59.8.556 *Hickman, J. S., & Geller, E. (2003). 
A safety self-management intervention for mining operations. 
Journal of Safety Research, 34, 299–308. 
doi:10.1016/S0022-4375(03)00032-X Holman, D. (2000). 
A dialogical approach to skill and skilled activity. 
Human Relations, 53, 957–980. 
doi:10.1177/0018726700537003 Holman, D., Pavlica, K., & Thorpe, R. (1997). 
Rethinking Kolb’s theory of experiential learning: The contribution of social constructionism and activity theory. 
Management Learning, 28, 135–148. 
doi:10.1177/ 1350507697282003 *Hong, O., Ronis, D. L., Lusk, S. L., & Kee, G. S. (2006). 
Efficacy of a computer-based hearing test and tailored hearing protection intervention. 
International Journal of Behavioral Medicine, 13, 304–314. 
doi: 10.1207/s15327558ijbm1304_5 *Hopkins, B. L. (1984). 
An investigation of the durability of behavioral procedures for reducing workers’ exposures to a suspect carcinogen. 
Cincinnati, OH: National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health. 
*Huang, J., Jiang, D., Wang, X., Liu, Y., Fennie, K., Burgess, J., & Williams, A. (2002). 
Changing knowledge, behavior and practice related to universal precautions among hospital nurses in China. 
Journal of Continuing Education in Nursing, 33, 217–224. 
Huffcutt, A. I., & Arthur, W. (1995). 
Development of a new outlier statistic for meta-analytic data. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 80, 327–334. 
doi:10.1037/0021-9010.80.2.327 *Hultman, G., Nordin, M., & Ortengren, R. (1984). 
The influence of a preventive educational programme on trunk flexion in janitors. 
Applied Ergonomics, 15, 127–133. 
doi:10.1016/0003-6870(84)90288-6 Hunter, J. E., & Schmidt, F. L. (2004). 
Methods of meta-analysis: Correcting for error and bias in research findings. 
Thousand Oaks, CA: Sage. 
*Hurlebaus, A. E., & Link, S. (1997). 
The effects of an aggressive behavior management program on nurses’ levels of knowledge, confidence, and safety. 
Journal of Nursing Staff Development, 13, 260–265. 
*Inman, C., & Blanciforti, L. (2002). 
Observed versus reported behaviors and a theoretically-based eye injury intervention for carpenters: Injury insights. 
Itasca, IL: National Safety Council Research and Statistical Services. 
*Jensen, L. K., & Friche, C. (2007). 
Effects of training to implement new tools and working methods to reduce knee load in floor layers. 
Applied Ergonomics, 38, 655–665. 
doi:10.1016/j.apergo.2006.03.008 *Johnsson, C., Carlosson, R., & Lagerstrom, M. (2002). 
Evaluation of training in patient handling and moving skills among hospital and home care personnel. 
Ergonomics, 45, 850–865. 
doi:10.1080/ 00140130210160920 Keith, N., & Frese, M. (2008). 
Effectiveness of error management training: A meta-analysis. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 93, 59–69. 
doi: 10.1037/0021-9010.93.1.59 *Kerrigan, D., Moreno, L., Rosario, S., Gomez, B., Jerez, H., Barrington, C., . 
. 
. 
Sweat, M. (2006). 
Environmental–structural interventions to reduce HIV/STI risk among female sex workers in the Dominican Republic. 
American Journal of Public Health, 96, 120–125. 
doi: 10.2105/AJPH.2004.042200 Kirscht, J. P. (1988). 
The health belief model and predictions of health action. 
In D. Gochman (Ed.), Health behavior (pp. 
27–41). 
New York, NY: Plenum Press. 
*Knobloch, M. J., & Broste, S. K. (1998). 
A hearing conservation program for Wisconsin youth working in agriculture. 
Journal of School Health, 68, 313–318. 
doi:10.1111/j.1746-1561.1998.tb00591.x *Komaki, J., Barwick, K. D., & Scott, L. R. (1978). 
A behavioral approach to occupational safety pinpointing and reinforcing safe performance in a food manufacturing plant. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 63, 434–445. 
doi:10.1037/0021-9010.63.4.434 *Komaki, J., Heinzmann, A. T., & Lawson, L. (1980). 
Effect of training and a component analysis of a behavioral safety program. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 65, 261–270. 
doi:10.1037/0021-9010.65.3.261 *Kowalski-Trakofler, K. M., & Barrett, E. (2003). 
The concept of degraded images applied to hazard recognition training in mining for reduction of lost time injuries. 
Journal of Safety Research, 34, 515–525. 
doi:10.1016/ j.jsr.2003.05.004 Labor Institute. 
(n.d.). 
Oil, Chemical, and Atomic Workers International Union/Labor Institute: Emergency response and prevention workbook. 
New York, NY: Author. 
Lave, J., & Wenger, E. (1991). 
Situated learning: Legitimate peripheral participation. 
New York, NY: Cambridge University Press. 
*Leslie, J. H., & Adams, S. K. (1973). 
Programmed safety through programmed learning. 
Human Factors, 15, 223–236. 
Lipsey, M. W., & Wilson, D. B. (2001). 
Practical meta-analysis. 
Thousand Oaks, CA: Sage. 
*Ludwig, T. D., & Geller, E. S. (1991). 
Improving the driving practices of pizza deliverers: Response generalization and moderating effects of driving history. 
Journal of Applied Behavior Analysis, 24, 31–44. 
doi: 10.1901/jaba.1991.24-31 *Ludwig, T. D., & Geller, E. S. (1997). 
Assigned versus participative goal setting and response generalization: Managing injury control among professional pizza deliverers. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 82, 253– 261. 
doi:10.1037/0021-9010.82.2.253 *Lueveswanij, S., Nittayananta, W., & Robison, V. A. (2000). 
Changing knowledge, attitudes, and practices of Thai oral health personnel with regard to AIDS: An evaluation of an educational intervention. 
Community Dental Health, 17, 165–171. 
*Lusk, S. L., Ronis, D., Kazanis, A. S., Eakin, B. L., Hong, O., & Raymond, D. (2003). 
Effectiveness of a tailored intervention to increase factory workers’ use of hearing protection. 
Nursing Research, 52, 289– 295. 
doi:10.1097/00006199-200309000-00003 *Luskin, J., Somers, C., Wooding, J., & Levenstein, C. (1992). 
Teaching health and safety: Problems and possibilities for learner-centered training. 
American Journal of Industrial Medicine, 22, 665–676. 
doi: 10.1002/ajim.4700220505 *Lynch, P., Cummings, M. J., Roberts, P. L., Herriott, M. J., Yates, B., & Stamm, W. E. (1990). 
Implementing and evaluating a system of generic infection precautions: Body substance isolation. 
American Journal of Infection Control, 18, 1–12. 
doi:10.1016/0196-6553(90)90204-6 *Lynch, R. M., & Freund, A. (2000). 
Short-term efficacy of back injury intervention project for patient care providers at one hospital. American Industrial Hygiene Association Journal, 61, 290–294. 
doi:10.1202/ 0002-8894(2000)0612.0.CO;2 *Ma, S., Dukers, N. H., van den Hoek, A., Yuliang, F., Zhiheng, C., Jiangting, F., & Xiusing, Z. (2002). 
Decreasing STD incidence and increasing condom use among Chinese sex workers following a short term intervention: A prospective cohort study. 
Sexually Transmitted Infections, 78, 110–114. 
doi:10.1136/sti.78.2.110 Mandatory Safety Standards Underground Coal Mines, 30 C.F.R. 
Part 75 (2008). 
67 *Marsh, P., & Kendrick, D. (1998). 
Injury prevention training: Is it effective? 
Health Education Research, 13, 47–56. 
doi:10.1093/her/ 13.1.47 *Martyny, J. W., Buchan, R. M., Keefe, T. J., & Blehm, K. D. (1988). 
Impact of an OSHA onsite consultation program with an educational component on small businesses in Colorado. 
Applied Industrial Hygiene, 3, 12–14. 
*Materna, B. L., Harrington, D., Scholz, P., Payne, S. F., Stubbs, H. A., Hipkins, K., & Uratsu, C. (2002). 
Results of an intervention to improve lead safety among painting contractors and their employees. 
American Journal of Industrial Medicine, 41, 119–130. 
doi:10.1002/ajim.10034 *Mattila, M. (1990). 
Improving working practices and workplace safety through behavior analysis in the veneer industry. 
In B. Das (Ed.), Advances in industrial ergonomics and safety (pp. 
957–961). 
London, England: Taylor & Francis. 
*Mattila, M., & Hyodynmaa, M. (1988). 
Promoting job safety in building: An experiment on the behavior analysis approach. 
Journal of Occupational Accidents, 9, 255–267. 
doi:10.1016/0376-6349(88)90017-X *Mayer, J. A., Slymen, D. J., Clapp, E., Pichon, L., Eckhardt, L., Eichenfield, F., & Oh, S. (2007). 
Promoting sun safety among U.S. 
Postal Service letter carriers: Impact of a 2-year intervention. 
American Journal of Public Health, 97, 559–565. 
doi:10.2105/AJPH.2005.083907 *McCauley, M. (1990). 
The effect of body mechanics instruction on work performance among young workers. 
American Journal of Occupational Therapy, 44, 402–407. 
McGraw, K. O., & Wong, S. P. (1992). 
A common language effect size statistic. 
Psychological Bulletin, 111, 361–365. 
doi:10.1037/00332909.111.2.361 *Michaels, D., Zoloth, S., Bernstein, N., Kass, D., & Schrier, K. (1992). 
Workshops are not enough: Making right-to-know training lead to workplace change. 
American Journal of Industrial Medicine, 22, 637– 649. 
doi:10.1002/ajim.4700220503 Midwest Consortium for Hazardous Waste Worker Training. 
(1992). 
The UBC Health & Safety Fund of North America: Hazardous waste participants manual. Cincinnati, OH: Author. 
Mining Safety and Health Administration. 
(n.d.-a). 
Base training plan. 
Retrieved from http://www.msha.gov/PerformanceCoal/TrainingPlans/ E&T%20Base%20Plan%20for%20UBB%20Mine.pdf Mining Safety and Health Administration. 
(n.d.-b). 
Fatalgrams and fatal reports: Fatality #3 through #31—April 5, 2010. 
Retrieved from http:// www.msha.gov/Fatals/2010/FAB10c0331.asp Mining Safety and Health Administration. 
(n.d.-c). 
Mine violations. 
Retrieved from http://www.msha.gov/PerformanceCoal/PerformanceCoal.asp Mining Safety and Health Administration. 
(n.d.-d). 
Title 30 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 48—Training and retraining of miners. 
Retrieved from http://www.msha.gov/30cfr/48.0htm Mirza, B. (2010). 
OSHA: BP responsible for oil spill worker training, protection. 
Alexandria, VA: Society for Human Resource Management. 
Retrieved from http://www.shrm.org/hrdisciplines/safetysecurity/ articles/Pages/OSHABP.aspx Morris, S. B. (2008). 
Estimating effect sizes from pretest-posttest-control group designs. 
Organizational Research Methods, 11, 364–386. 
doi: 10.1177/1094428106291059 Morris, S. B., & DeShon, R. P. (2002). 
Combining effect size estimates in meta-analysis with repeated measures and independent-groups designs. 
Psychological Methods, 7, 105–125. 
doi:10.1037/1082-989X.7.1.105 Morrow, P. C., & Crum, M. R. (1998). 
The effects of perceived and objective safety risk on employee outcomes. 
Journal of Vocational Behavior, 53, 300–313. 
doi:10.1006/jvbe.1997.1620 Mullet, E., Cuitad, N., & Riviere-Shafighi, S. (2004). 
Cognitive processes involved in the assessment of health hazards’ severity. 
Health, Risk, and Society, 6, 277–288. 
doi:10.1080/1369857042000275678 *Na¨sa¨nen, M., & Saari, J. (1987). 
The effects of positive feedback on housekeeping and accidents at a shipyard. 
Journal of Occupational Accidents, 8, 237–250. 
doi:10.1016/0376-6349(87)90001-0 *Nieuwenhuijsen, E. R. (2004). 
Health behavior change among office workers: An exploratory study to prevent repetitive strain injuries. 
Work, 23, 215–224. 
Occupational Safety and Health Act, 29 U.S.C. ch. 15 (1970). 
*Parkinson, D. K., Bromet, E. J., Dew, M. A., Dunn, L. O., Barkman, M., & Wright, M. (1989). 
Effectiveness of the United Steel Workers of America Coke Oven Intervention Program. 
Journal of Occupational Medicine, 31, 464–472. 
*Patros, S. (2001). 
Healthcare worker compliance with standard precautions: A study of two small community hospitals (Unpublished doctoral dissertation). 
University of Kentucky, Lexington, KY. *Pepijn, D. D. M., Bierma-Zeinstra, S. M. A., van Poppel, M. N. M., Jellema, P., Willemsen, S. P., van Tulder, M. W., & Koes, B. W. (2007). 
Lumbar supports to prevent recurrent low back pain among home care workers: A randomized trial. Annals of Internal Medicine, 14, 685–692. 
Perez-Floriano, L. R. (2001). 
Hazard information, risk perception, cultural values, and safety compliance: A comparison of Canada, Mexico, and the United States (Unpublished doctoral dissertation). 
California School of Professional Psychology, San Diego, CA. Perez-Floriano, L. R., & Gonzalez, J. A. (2007). 
Risk, safety and culture in Brazil and Argentina: The case of TransInc Corporation. 
International Journal of Manpower, 28, 403–417. 
doi:10.1108/01437720710778394 *Perry, M. J., & Layde, P. M. (2003). 
Farm pesticides: Outcomes of a randomized controlled intervention to reduce risks. 
American Journal of Preventive Medicine, 24, 310–315. 
doi:10.1016/S0749-3797(03) 00023-0 *Peters, R. H. (2002). 
Strategies for improving miner’s training. 
Washington, DC: U.S. 
Department of Health and Human Services. 
*Peterson, E. L., McGlothlin, J. D., & Blue, C. L. (2004). 
The development of an ergonomics training program to identify, evaluate, and control musculoskeletal disorders among nursing assistants at a state run veterans home. 
Journal of Occupational and Environmental Hygiene, 1, 10–16. 
Pidgeon, N. (1991). 
Safety culture and risk management in organizations. 
Journal of Cross-Cultural Psychology, 22, 129–140. 
doi:10.1177/ 0022022191221009 *Poosanthanasarn, N., Lohachit, C., Fungladda, W., Sriborapa, S., & Pulkae, C. (2005). 
An ergonomics intervention program to prevent worker injuries in a metal autoparts factory. 
Southeast Asian Journal of Tropical Medicine and Public Health, 36, 512–522. 
*Porru, S., Donato, F., Apostoli, P., Coniglio, L., Piergiorgio, D., & Alessio, L. (1993). 
The utility of health education among lead workers: The experience of one program. 
American Journal of Industrial Medicine, 23, 473–481. 
doi:10.1002/ajim.4700230310 Prentice-Dunn, S., & Rogers, R. W. (1986). 
Protection motivation theory and preventive health: Beyond the health belief model. 
Health Education Research, 1, 153–161. 
doi:10.1093/her/1.3.153 Raju, N. S., & Brand, P. A. (2003). 
Determining the significance of correlations corrected for unreliability and range restriction. 
Applied Psychological Measurement, 27, 52–71. 
doi:10.1177/ 0146621602239476 Raju, N. S., Burke, M. J., Normand, J., & Langlois, G. (1991). 
A new meta-analytic procedure. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 76, 432–446. 
doi:10.1037/0021-9010.76.3.432 *Rasmussen, K., Carsrensen, O., Lauritsen, J. M., Glassock, D. J., Hansen, O. N., & Jensen, U. F. (2003). 
Prevention of farm injuries in Denmark. 
Scandinavian Journal of Work, Environment, and Health, 29, 288–296. 
*Ray, P. S., Bishop, P. A., & Wang, M. Q. (1997). 
Efficacy of the components of a behavioral safety program. 
International Journal of Industrial Ergonomics, 19, 19–29. 
doi:10.1016/0169-8141(95)00067-4 *Ray, P. S., Purswell, J. L., & Schlegel, R. E. (1990). 
A behavioral approach to improve safety at the workplace. 
In B. Das (Ed.), Advances 68 in industrial ergonomics and safety (pp. 
983–988). 
London, England: Taylor & Francis. 
*Reber, R. A., & Wallin, J. A. (1984). 
The effects of training, goal setting and knowledge of results on safe behavior: A component analysis. 
Academy of Management Journal, 27, 544–560. 
doi:10.2307/256044 *Reber, R. A., Wallin, J. A., & Chhokar, J. S. (1984). 
Reducing industrial accidents: A behavioral experiment. 
Industrial Relations, 23, 119–125. 
doi:10.1111/j.1468-232X.1984.tb00881.x *Reed, D. B. (2003). 
Observation study of students who completed high school agricultural safety education program. 
Journal of Agricultural Safety and Health, 9, 275–283. 
Roberts, J. T. (1997). 
Negotiating both sides of the plant gate: Gender, hazardous facility workers and community responses to technological hazards. 
Current Sociology, 45, 157–177. 
doi:10.1177/ 001139297045003009 *Robertson, M. M., Amick, B. C., Hupert, N., Pellerin-Dionne, M., Cha, E., & Katz, J. (2002). 
Effects of a participatory ergonomics intervention computer workshop for university students: A pilot intervention to prevent disability in tomorrow’s workers. 
Work, 18, 305–314. 
Robson, L., Stephenson, C., Schulte, P., Amick, B., Chan, S., Bielecky, A., . 
. 
. 
Grubb, P. (2010). 
A systematic review of the effectiveness of training & education for the protection of workers. 
Toronto, Ontario, Canada: Institute for Work & Health. 
Rogers, R. W. (1983). 
Cognitive and physiological process in fear appeals and attitude change: A revised theory of protection motivation. 
In J. R. Cacioppo & R. E. Petty (Eds.), Social psychology: A sourcebook (pp. 
153–176). 
New York, NY: Guilford Press. 
Ronis, D. L. (1992). 
Conditional health threats: Health beliefs, decisions, and behaviors among adults. 
Health Psychology, 11, 127–134. 
doi: 10.1037/0278-6133.11.2.127 *Rundio, A. (1994). 
Understanding microbiological concepts and computerized surveillance: Enhancing professional practice. 
Health Care Supervision, 12, 20–27. 
Rundmo, T. (1996). 
Associations between risk perception and safety. 
Safety Science, 24, 197–209. 
Rundmo, T. (2000). 
Safety climate, attitudes, and risk perception in Norsk Hydro. 
Safety Science, 34, 47–59. 
doi:10.1016/S0925-7535(00)00006-0 *Saari, J. (1987). 
Management of housekeeping by feedback. 
Ergonomics, 30, 313–317. 
doi:10.1080/00140138708969712 *Saari, J., & Na¨sa¨nen, M. (1989). 
The effect of positive feedback on industrial housekeeping and accidents: A long-term study at a shipyard. 
International Journal of Industrial Ergonomics, 4, 201–211. 
doi: 10.1016/0169-8141(89)90003-6 *Sadler, O. W., & Montgomery, G. M. (1982). 
The application of positive practice overcorrection to the use of hearing protection. 
American Industrial Hygiene Association Journal, 43, 451–454. 
doi:10.1080/ 15298668291410026 Sanna, L. (1999). 
Mental simulations, affect, and subjective confidence: Timing is everything. 
Psychological Science, 10, 339–345. 
doi:10.1111/ 1467-9280.00165 Schon, D. (1983). 
The reflective practitioner: How professionals think in action. 
London, England: Maurice Temple Smith. 
Schwartz, N., & Clore, G. L. (1988). 
How do I feel about it? 
Informative functions of affective states. 
In K. Fiedler & J. Forgas (Eds.), Affect, cognition, and social behavior (pp. 
44–62). 
Toronto, Ontario, Canada: Hogrefe International. *Seto, W. H., Ching, T. Y., Chu, Y. B., & Fielding, F. (1990). 
Reduction of the frequency of needle recapping by effective education: A need for conceptual alteration. 
Infection Control and Hospital Epidemiology, 11, 194–196. 
doi:10.1086/646149 Shadish, W. R., Robinson, L., & Lu, C. (1999). 
ES: A computer program for effect size calculation. 
St. Paul, MN: Assessment Systems. 
Shotter, J. (1995). 
Dialogical psychology. 
In A. Smith, R. Harre, & L. Van Langenhove (Eds.), Rethinking psychology (pp. 
160–178). 
London, England: Sage. 
Sinclair, R. C., Smith, R., Colligan, M., Prince, M., Nyguyen, T., & Stayner, L. (2003). 
Evaluation of a safety training program in three food service companies. 
Journal of Safety Research, 34, 547–558. 
doi: 10.1016/j.jsr.2003.03.003 Slovic, P. (1987, April 17). 
Perception of risk. 
Science, 236, 280–285. 
doi:10.1126/science.3563507 Slovic, P. (1997). 
Trust, emotion, sex, politics, and science: Surveying the risk-assessment battlefield. 
In M. Bazerman, D. Messick, A. Tenbrunsel, & K. Wade-Benzoni (Eds.), Environment, ethics, and behavior: The psychology of environmental valuation and degradation (pp. 
277–313). 
San Francisco, CA: New Lexington Press. 
Slovic, P., & Peters, E. (2006). 
Risk perception and affect. 
Current Directions in Psychological Science, 15, 322–325. 
doi:10.1111/j.14678721.2006.00461.x Smith, P. M., & Mustard, C. A. (2007). 
How many employees receive safety training during the first year of a new job? 
Injury Prevention, 13, 37–41. 
doi:10.1136/ip.2006.013839 *Stave, C., Torner, M., & Eklof, M. (2007). 
An intervention method for occupational safety in farming: Evaluation of the effect and process. 
Applied Ergonomics, 38, 357–368. 
doi:10.1016/j.apergo.2006.04.025 Steel, P. D., & Kammeyer-Mueller, J. D. (2002). 
Comparing meta-analytic moderator estimation techniques under realistic conditions. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 87, 96–111. 
doi:10.1037/0021-9010.87.1.96 *Stephens, S. D., & Ludwig, T. D. (2005). 
Improving anesthesia nurse compliance with universal precautions using group goals and public feedback. 
Journal of Organizational Behavior Management, 25, 37–71. 
doi:10.1300/J075v25n02_02 *Streff, F. M., Kalsher, M. J., & Geller, E. S. (1993). 
Developing efficient workplace safety programs: Observations of response covariation. 
Journal of Organizational Behavior Management, 13, 3–14. 
doi:10.1300/ J075v13n02_02 Strong, M. H., Jeanneret, P. R., McPhail, M., Blakley, B. R., & D’Egidio, E. L. (1999). 
Work context: Taxonomy and measurement of the work environment. 
In N. G. Peterson, M. D. Mumford, W. C. Borman, P. R. Jeanneret, & E. A. Fleishman (Eds.), An occupational information system for the 21st century: The development of the O*NET (pp. 
127– 145). 
Washington, DC: American Psychological Association. 
doi: 10.1037/10313-008 Sweeny, K., & Shepperd, J. A. (2007). 
Do people brace sensibly? 
Risk judgments and event likelihood. 
Personality and Social Psychology Bulletin, 33, 1064–1075. 
doi:10.1177/0146167207301024 *Symes, A. M., Graveling, R. A., & Campbell, S. J. (1992). 
Risk training and materials handling. 
Edinburgh, Scotland: Institute of Occupational Medicine. 
Taylor, P. J., Russ-Eft, D. F., & Chan, D. W. L. (2005). 
A meta-analytic review of behavior modeling training. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 90, 692–709. 
doi:10.1037/0021-9010.90.4.692 Tennyson, R. D., & Jorczak, R. L. (2008). 
A conceptual framework for the empirical study of instructional games. 
In H. F. O’Neil & R. S. Perez (Eds.), Computer games and team and individual learning (pp. 
3–20). 
New York, NY: Elsevier. 
*Troup, J. D., & Rauhala, H. H. (1987). 
Ergonomics and training. 
International Journal of Nursing Studies, 24, 325–330. 
doi:10.1016/00207489(87)90025-3 Turner, N., & Gray, G. C. (2009). 
Socially constructing safety. 
Human Relations, 62, 1259–1266. 
doi:10.1177/0018726709339863 *Uwakwe, C. B. (2000). 
Systematized HIV/AIDS education for student nurses at the University of Ibadan, Nigeria: Impact on knowledge, attitudes and compliance with universal precautions. 
Journal of Advanced Nursing, 32, 416–424. 
doi:10.1046/j.1365-2648.2000.01492.x *Vaught, C., Brinch, M. J., & Kellner, H. J. (1988). 
Instructional mode and 69 its effect on initial self-contained self-rescuer donning attempts during training. 
Pittsburgh, PA: U.S. 
Bureau of Mines. 
*Vela Acosta, M. S., Chapman, P., Bigelow, P., Kennedy, C., & Buchan, R. (2005). 
Measuring success in a pesticide risk reduction program among migrant farmworkers in Colorado. 
American Journal of Industrial Medicine, 47, 237–245. 
doi:10.1002/ajim.20136 *Videman, T., Rauhala, H., Asp, S., Lindstrom, K., Cedercreutz, G., Kamppi, M., & Troup, J. D. (1989). 
Patient-handling skill, back injuries, and back pain: An intervention study in nursing. 
Spine, 14, 148–156. 
doi:10.1097/00007632-198902000-00002 *Wallen, E. S., & Mulloy, K. B. (2005). 
Computer based safety training: An investigation of methods. 
Occupational and Environmental Medicine, 62, 257–262. 
doi:10.1136/oem.2004.015958 *Wang, H., Fennie, K., He, G., Burgess, J., & Williams, A. B. (2003). 
A training programme for prevention of occupational exposure to bloodborne pathogens: Impact on knowledge, behaviour and incidence of needle stick injuries among student nurses in Changsha, People’s Republic of China. 
Journal of Advanced Nursing, 41, 187–194. 
doi: 10.1046/j.1365-2648.2003.02519.x Warren, D. E., & Smith-Crowe, K. (2008). 
Deciding what’s right: Sanctions, embarrassment, and moral judgment. 
Research in Organizational Behavior, 28, 81–105. 
doi:10.1016/j.riob.2008.04.004 Weil, S. W., & McGill, I. (Eds.). (1989). 
Making sense of experiential learning: Diversity in theory and practice. 
Buckingham, England: Society for Research Into Higher Education/Open University Press. 
Weinstein, N. D. (2000). 
Perceived probability, perceived severity, and health-protective behavior. 
Health Psychology, 19, 65–74. 
doi:10.1037/ 0278-6133.19.1.65 *Wertz, D. C., Sorenson, J. R., Liebling, L., Kessler, L., & Heeren, T. C. (1987). 
Knowledge and attitudes of AIDS health care providers before and after education programs. 
Public Health Reports, 102, 248–254. 
Weyman, A. K., & Clarke, D. D. (2003). 
Investigating the influence of organizational role on perceptions of risk in deep coal mines. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 88, 404–412. 
doi:10.1037/0021-9010.88.3.404 *Whitby, M., Stead, P., & Najman, J. M. (1991). 
Needlestick injury: Impact of a recapping device and an associated education program. 
Infection Control and Hospital Epidemiology, 12, 220–225. 
doi: 10.1086/646328 Wildemeersch, D. (1989). 
The principal meaning of dialogue for the construction and transformation of reality. 
In S. W. Weil & I. McGill (Eds.), Making sense of experiential learning (pp. 
60–69). 
Buckingham, England: Society for Research Into Higher Education/Open University Press. 
*Williams, J. H., & Geller, E. S. (2000). 
Behavior-based intervention for occupational safety: Critical impact of social comparison feedback. 
Journal of Safety Research, 31, 135–142. 
doi:10.1016/S00224375(00)00030-X *Williams, T. C., & Zahed, H. (1996). 
Computer-based training versus traditional lecture: Effect on learning and retention. 
Journal of Business and Psychology, 11, 297–310. 
doi:10.1007/BF02193865 *Wolford, R., Larson, M., Merrick, D., Tillett, S., Morris, S., & Keifer, M. (1997). 
A comparison of safety-and-health training of painters in Alaska, Oregon, and Washington. 
Washington, DC: Center to Protect Workers’ Rights. 
*Wong, E. S., Stotka, J. L., Chinchilli, V. M., Williams, D. S., Stuart, G., & Markowitz, S. M. (1991). 
Are universal precautions effective in reducing the number of occupational exposures among health care workers? 
JAMA, 265, 1123–1128. 
doi:10.1001/jama.265.9.1123 *Wu, Z., Detels, R., Ji, G., Xu, C., Rou, K., Ding, H., & Li, V. (2002). 
Diffusion of HIV/AIDS knowledge, positive attitudes, and behaviors through training of health professionals in China. 
AIDS Education and Prevention, 14, 379–390. 
doi:10.1521/aeap.14.6.379.24074 *Wynn, J. S., & Black, S. (1998). 
Evaluation of retention of safety and survival training content versus industry standard for training. 
Air Medical Journal, 17, 166–168. 
doi:10.1016/S1067-991X(98)90044-X *Yarrall, M. (1986). 
Educating for hearing conversation. 
Occupational Health, 10, 333–335. 
*Yassi, A., Cooper, J., Tate, R., Gerlach, S., Muir, M., Trottier, J., & Massey, K. (2001). 
A randomized controlled trial to prevent patient lift and transfer injuries of health care workers. 
Spine, 26, 1739–1746. 
doi:10.1097/00007632-200108150-00002 *Zohar, D., Cohen, A., & Azar, N. (1980). 
Promoting increased use of ear protectors in noise through information feedback. 
Human Factors, 22, 69–79. 
Received January 27, 2010 Revision received September 28, 2010 Accepted September 29, 2010 Ⅲ 70BURKE ET AL. 